
 
  
 

II

VNOID3U NE3HInOS n

 

 

 

|

 

III

AHVMSIT?

 

 

   
    

H E N I q H A NT U

AND

CHE NIRU KT A

THE OLDEST INDIAN TREATISE

ON ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS

CRITICALLY EDITED FROM ORIGINAL MANUSCRIPTS AND
TRANSLATED FOR THE FIRSi TIME INTO ENGLISH, WITH
INTRODUCTION, EXEGETICAL AND CRITICAL NOTES,
THREE INDEXES AND EIGHO APPENDICES

it;,—

BY

LAKSHMAN SARUP, M. A. (Paxs.) D. PHIL. (Oxox.)

INTRODUCTION

HUMPHREY MILFORD
OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS

LONDON EDINBURGH GLASGOW NEW YORK
TORONTO MELBOURNE CAPE TOWN - BOMBAY

1920

 


 


AND

T H E NI R U K T A

THE OLDEST INDIAN TREATISE
_ON ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS

CRITICALLY EDITED FROM ORIGINAL MANUSCRIPTS AND
TRANSLATED FOR THE FIRST TIME INTO ENGLISH, WITH
INTRODUCTION, EXEGETICAL AND CRITICAL NOTES,
THREE INDEXES AND EIGHT APPENDICES

LAKSHMAN SARUP, M. A. (Paxs.) D. Pur. (Oxox.)

INTRODUCTION

papun ne-;

HUMPHREY MILFORD

OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS
LONDON EDINBURGH GLASGOW NEW YORK
TORONTO MELBOURNE CAPE TOWN - BOMBAY

 


PRINTED IN ENGLAND
BY FREDERICK HALL
AT THE OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS

 

~. &
hake

t*. 3
१.९ 8 «
whs.
nilit? ^*


/
F । .
w s-
"l m
~ » ७

m ~

AQ

N

P R E F A C E

WHEN I first came to Oxford in the autumn of 1916, I undertook,
on the suggestion of Professor A. A. Maedonell, to collate the hitherto
unutilized Nirukte Manuscripts, contained in the Max Muller Memorial
and the Chandra Shum Shere Collections, and to see if some new light

ifrcould be thrown on the text of the Nirwkta. A careful examination of the
॰ट्टुप्ताग्रुप्ष्टार्गृब्र्थ्यऽ at my disposal has led ime to the conclusion that the text of
Hithe Nirukta has been gradually expanded by the addition of short passages,
chiefly in the etymological explanations which easily lent themselves to
such interpolations. At present the history of this gradual expansion
, can be traced only down to the thirteenth century A.D. There is a lack
3 of reliable evidence going further. But I have reasons to suspect that even
- up to the thirteenth century, the text of the Nirukta has not been handed
; down with a uniform and unbroken tradition. A few remarks of Durga
inscattered here and there in his commentary open up the possibility that
the interpolators were already busy with their nefarious work,. There
is no doubt that the text had already been tampered with. Thus one
should be cautious in making Yaska responsible for many passages, and the
änumerous absurd derivations contained therein, now commonly attributed
to him. All such passages have been pointed out in my edition of the
[text, which sets forth as clearly as possible the history of the gradual

15 . l
" exvpansion by means of square brackets and foot-notes.

3 - 1 have also produced, for the first time, a complete English translation
of the whole of the Nirukta. I have added numerous exegetical and
critical notes with a view to extract as much information as possible
from Yaska. And in order to make my work further useful, I have
also prepared the following Indexes and Appendices: (1) An Index to
the words of the Nigkantuw with meanings;] (2) An Index to the words of

the Quoted Passages occurring in the Nirukt« with meanings; (3) an Index
A 2

इ क्य तद cox 3 &
***,. // 4 "tet B
Pom C/C wla $ V 28.


2 PREFACE

Verborum to the Nirukta minus the Quoted Passages with meanings;
(4) An alphabetical list of the Quotations occurring in the Nirukta;
(5) An alphabetical list of the Untraced Quotations occurring in the
Nirukta ; (6) A list of Vedic Quotations arranged in the order of the
Samhitas; (7) A list of the Authorities mentioned by Yaska ; ($) A list
of Stories related by Yaska; (9) The Relation of the Niruki« to other
texts, ie. a collection of parallel passages from the Brdhmanas, Prati-
sakhyas, Mahabhasya, &e.; (10) An alphabetical list of the etymologies
to be found in the Nirukta; (11) A list of the Nirukta passages quoted
by Sayana. The whole work being embodied in the form of a dissertation
was presented to, and accepted by, the University of Oxford, for the
degree of Doctor of Philosophy. Notwithstanding the Statt. Tit. VI,
See. v, § 5. (8), which requires an Advanced Student to publish his thesis
40 eætenso before supplicating for the said degree, the Committee for
Advanced Studies very kindly permitted me-taking into consideration
the very high cost of printing at present-to publish the Introduction
alone. I think I need make no apology for bringing out this part only
at present, in the hope that the rest will follow in course of time.

If my labours have borne any fruit, it is simply due to the guidance
which I have received in the course of my work, and which it is my very
pleasant duty to acknowledge.

I owe a great debt of gratitude to Professor A. A. Macdonell. The
inception of this study is, as I have already mentioned, due to his
suggestion. The whole work was done under his supervision. His guidance
and encouragement have been of invaluable help to me. And through his
recommendation the Administrators to the Max Miiller Memorial Fund have
voted a sum of £50 for the publication of my dissertation-my thanks to
them for this generous help. I am much indebted to Dr. F. W. Thomas,
Librarian, India Office, and to Dr. J. Morison, Librarian, Indian Institute,
Oxford, for granting me facilities in the use of books, and for their
readiness to help me in every way whenever I had the occasion to seek
their advice. I desire to put on record my special thanks to Mr. Madan,
ex-Librarian of the Bodleian, for permission to work on valuable manu-
scripts during the dark days of air-raids, when the manuseripts had been
carefully stored away. Professor A. B. Keith has placed me under great

 


PREFACE 3

obligation by giving me his valuable opinion on many difficult points.
Dr. T. W. Arnold, C.LE., Educational Adviser to the Secretary of State
for India, has taken a good deal of interest in my work and has supported
me in almost every obstacle to the completion of my studies.

It has been my privilege to interpret an ancient Indian author, who,
as far as Etymology and Semanties are concerned, is far in advance of
the greatest of ancient Greek writers like Plato and Aristotle, and if he
comes to be better appreciated, my labour will be amply repaid.

LAKSHMAN SARUP.

BALLIOL COLLEGE, Oxr;ORD.
July, 1920,

A 3

 


 

 


I.

II.

TABLE OF CONTENTS

INTRODUCTION TO THE NIGI/ANTU

a. Detailed description of Manuscripts

b. Two recensions

e. Devarija and his commentary

d. Roth's edition of the Nighaontu . .
e. Bibliotheca Indica edition of the
f. Title of the work .

g. Division of the Nighuutu

h. Author of the Nighantu

INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

a. Earlier editions of the Néiruktu .
b. Detailed description of the Manuscuptb
c. Relationship of the Manuseripts-two recensions
d. Omissio ex homoeoteleuto in Sanskrit Manuseripts
e. Dittography in Sanskrit Manuscripts
f. 1 Three stages of interpolations .
. Parallel instance of Servius, commentator of V1rg11
g. Commentatms of Yaska . -
h. Yaska's contributions to Etymology, Phllolocry, and
Semantics
1 Date of X(wbka
. Phonetic cquipment of Yaska

3 Importance of Etymology

4. Principles of Etymology .

5. Plato on Etymology

6. Philological speculations of Yaska .

7. Origin of Language

8. Parts of Speech .

9. Aristotle's definition of Youn and Verb

10. Semantics How names are given: Criticism

and Rejoinder

i. Early anti-Vedie Scepticism

PAGES

10
11
12
13
13
14

15
19
39
40
41
45
48
49

 


 

 


»
॰॰॰॰॰॰॰

INTRODUCTION

THE NIGHANTU

Tnx following manuscripts have been collated for this edition of the

Nighaontu :
l. Max Müller Memorial MS. - e. 5 = M
$2. ., » as » e. 6 - पु`
3 and 4. ,, e f y e. 7 = M 8 and M4 respectively
5. Chandra Shum Shere MS. - d. 184 - C1
6, 7, 8. ,, W । । । e. 62 - C2, C8, C4 respectively
9. MS. Sanskrit . 17 - 8
10. MS. Wilson 379 - W l
11 and 12. /,, B 502 - W 2, W 3 respectively
18. ., »» 503 - W 4

a. Detailed Description of the Manuscripts.

M 1.-This is a neatly-written manuseript in Devanagari characters on
paper. - It originally consisted of 13 leaves, but the first two are missing.
The accent has been marked in yellow ink. The text is not bounded on
either side by double lines.

The size of the paper is 94" x 3%".

The number of lines on each page varies from 9 to 10. The date given
on f. 14 v. as Suk. 1455, is not reliable, and has obviously been added at
a later period by a different hand, as the evidence of the writing indicates.
The manuscript is well preserved, but neither its general appearance nor
the condition and the colour of its paper, nor its spelling lend the least
support to the date given above. It is on the whole accurate. It belongs
to the longer recension. The seribe seems to have been a devotee of Krsna,
for he says: Ht कृष्णर्ग्यणमस्तु- Neither the name of the scribe, nor of the
owner, nor of the place of its origin, is known.

M2.-This is perhaps the oldest of all the manuscripts of the Aigha
It is written in charaeters on paper, but is not well preserved.
In many places it suffers from illegibility, partly caused by the smudging
of the ink.

It begins: ऊँ नमो गणेशाय ॥ ऊँ ॥ अथ शिक्षां प्रवच्यामि . . . , &e. It gives
॥5९ Catustaya in 26 leaves. 'The different treatises are not bodily

 


- - मन त क -
. « दी न॥ क्त ॥ A a
«

6 - INTRODUCTION TO THE NIGHANTU

separated from each other, all the four, i. e. Siks&, Jyotisa, Chandas and
Nighantu being written continuously without a break. The end of each
is found on f. 4 r., £. 7 v., £. 12 r., and f. 24 v. respectively. 'The accent is
not marked. The text is bounded on cach side by double black lines.

The size of the paper is 98" x 44".

The number of lines on each page varies from 10-18.

It has preserved the archaic spelling in many cases, especially in the
case of At; GITWTIN: is written TTTHTW: and तोरयाण: as T4ICWTN: on
f. 22 v. Ff, 15-26 are slightly worm-eaten. It was copied in the month
of Phalguna, Samvat 1778, by a scribe named Sivananda. -It belongs to
the shorter recension.

M3.-This is a paper manuscript, neatly written in Devandgari
characters. In this manuscript also the Sikgd, Jyotisa, Chandas, and

ighantu are written without a break between them. The accent in the
righæutu is not marked. The size of the paper is 9" x4", and the
number of lines on each page is 7. The text is bounded on each side by
double red lines. The name of the owner is Agarama Kedaresvara, son of
Srr Nandar&ma. . It was copied for private study at Benares. The date given

is Samrat 1801: (sic) संवत् १८०१ नामितति tadata शुक्लपक्षे पंचमीयं बुद्धवासरे
ग्रंथसमाप्ति: ॥ शुभमस्तु ॥ The manuscript ends: (sic) सर्वॆषां खण्डिकासंख्या ॥ १००॥

शोकसंख्या ॥३७५॥ (-
।

मूर्षहस्ते न दातव्यं एवं वदति पुस्तकम् ॥
शुभं भवतु ॥ कल्याणमस्तु ॥

It belongs to the shorter recension.

M 4.-This contains the ,ऽ’र्ट/छंदुंट्टु’ठाच्, &c., without a break between them, and
gives, in 28 leaves, the NiksG, Syotiga, Chandas, and Nighantu, which end on
f. 5 v., f. 8 », f. 18 ». and f. 23 v. respectively. The five adhayas of the

*qhamtuw, end on f. 15 v., f. 18 v., f. 21 r., f. 22 v., f. 28 v. respectively. - It
begins : श्री गणेशाय नम: ॥ श्री दुगादेवै नम: ॥ ऊँ अथ शिक्षां &c. (It
९५05; इति नेघंटुके पंचमोध्याय: समाप्त: ॥

The size of paper is 82" x82" ; the number of lines on cach page is
8. The text is bounded on either side by double red lines. The accent is
marked in the Nighontw with red ink. No date is given, nor the name
of the seribe, nor the place.

It belongs to the longer recension.

C 1.-It consists of three different manuscripts. - The first manuscript,
which gives the Nighontu in full, seems to be a fragment, for the first folio
is numbered 10. It appears that originally it gave the Sibs& Catustayu,

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE MANUSCRIPTS 7

and that now the Nighantu alone survives. It begins on f. 10 r,, and ends
on f. 22 r. The text is bounded on cach side by double red lines. The
accent is marked. The size of the paper is 9" x 44%" ; the number of lines
is 11. It ends: (sic) <fa faget पंचमोध्याय: ॥ शरी तोलभांडेश्चरापेणमस्तु ॥
Tt गंगा प्रसन् ॥

The date Sak. 1875, and the name of the then owner, Gopala Ananda
Sarasvati, are added in a different, probably later, hand. It belongs to the
louger recension.

C 2.-Is the first of five different manuscripts bound in one volume
[e. 62]. It contains the Nighantu in 17 leaves, marking the accent with
red ink in the first «dhkyaya only.

It begins: I श्री गणेशाय नम: ॥ हरि: ऊँ ॥ It ends: (sic) Tha fame

' पंचमोध्याय: ॥ समाप्त: ॥ Neither the date nor the name of the seribe is
given.

The size of the paper is 8%" x 8%". The number of lines on each page
is 7. Ff. 15, 16, 17 are slightly worm-eaten.

It is written in Devanagart characters on paper, and is fairly accurate,
It belongs to the longer recension.

C3-C4.-Are contained in the same volume, each being a
Cutustaya, of which the Nighautu forms a part. The text of each of these
Siksa Cutustaya is written continuously, and is bounded by double red
lines. The size of the paper is 8%" x 4, and the number of lines on each
page is 10. The first two sections of the first adhy@ya are missing in the
first manuseript. - The other manuscript is dated Sumzat, 1852.

Both are written in Devana@gars characters and represent the longer
recension.

The other manuscripts are a SiksG attributed to Panini, and a Siksa
attributed to Yajfiavalkya. The latter begins: (sic) St zit umWTW @a:
याज्ञवल्क्य उवाच व्याख्यास्याम: उदात्तश्चानुदात्तञ्च
तथॆव तत् लक्षणं वर्णयिष्यामि देवतं स्थानमेव च, &c. It ends: afa sit

याज्ञवल्क्यमुनिकृता वाञसनेयीशिक्षा समाप्ता संवत्? so माघमासे . . . . समाप्ता
राम: विश विश विश fa.

Another manuscript bound in the same volume gives in seven leaves
the Siksa of the Sima Veda, attributed to Lomaga. It begins: ऊ नम:
सामवेदाय. It has preserved some old spellings; for instance, it writes

॰वेट् as Tqq.

The last manuscript gives tlie Ch«ndomasjar* in 5 leaves. It begins: (sic)

श्री गणपतये नम: ॥ प्रणम्य विदं पुरुषं छन्द:शास्त्रेषु निञ्चितं । विष्णुभट्टेस्तिदं प्रीतक्तं

 


8 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIGHANTU

कंदोमंजरिमादिता ॥१॥ कथ्यते ॥ प्रथमं छन्द: ॥ गायत्री ॥ उदाहरणानि॰
अगिमीळि ८। ए। ८ पदपंक्ति, &c.

It ends: «fa श्री विप्णुभट्टविरचिता कंदोमंजरी समाप्ता ।

S4.-This manuscript contains five works. 'The first four consist of
the $1]ch Catustaya, of which the first three works are probably written
by the same scribe. The first part gives the SilsG in 6 leaves, the second the
Jyotisa in 4, the third the Chandas in 7 leaves, the fourth the
The first and third were copied in Saka 1665, and the fourth in Saka 1660.
All these four parts are complete in themselves individually, each being
separately numbered. - The name of their former owner is Bhatta Jayani-
rayana of Themti.

The Nighantw consists of 9 leaves. The text is bounded on each side
by a pair of double red lines. It is a neatly-written manuscript, The
accent is marked with red ink. The size of the paper is 937 x 33". For
further details see Cutalogus Codd. MSS. Bib. Bodi., by Winternitz and
Keith, vol. ii, p. 105.

The manuseript belongs to the longer recension, and does not seem to
have been used by Roth.

W 1.-This contains two different manuscripts. - The first is Veddartho-
dipika, a commentary on the Sarvinukramani by Sadgurugisya.

The second is the Nighontu. It begins on f. l v., and ends on f. 10 r.
It is without accent, quite modern, and full of mistakes. It is Roth's F.
It belongs to the shorter recension.

For further details, see Catalogus Codd. MSS, Bib. Bodl., by Winternitz
and Keith, vol. ii, p. 104.

W 2.-This manuscript contains three different works.

I. The first work is the Siksa Catustaya. - It is a continuously-written
manuscript, the four parts ending on f. 8 v., f. 6 v., f. 11 v., and f. 28
respectively. - The Nighan{u is given without accent. It is Roth's C, and
belongs to the shorter recension. For further details see Catalogus Codd.
MSS. Bib. BodlL., vol. ii, p. 104.

W 3. II. This is the second manuscript bound in the volume just
mentioned. It gives the Nighantu in 24 leaves. It is without accent.
The name of the scribe, partially obliterated by yellow pigment, is the

following : fafed i i I
It is Roth's D, and belongs to the shorter recension.
III. The third manuseript is the Anur@kanukraman.
W 4.-This manuscript contains two different works. The first is the
। - Its first three parts are written continuously. - 'The

1 The fifth is the UHarasalkam of the Nirukfa,

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE MANUSCRIPTS 9

Nighantu is separated from the rest. It ends on f. 16, which gives a list
of the total number of words and KAkandas for each adhyaya as follows :-

Khamndla - words
lst 17 412 4th 3 279
2nd 22 516 5th 6 151
3rd 30 410

It is Roth's E, and belongs to the longer recension.

To these manuscripts, which I have directly collated myself, may be
added the A and B which were used by Roth (not directly collated by me),
besides C.D.E.F = W I, W 2, W383, W4, and #, ख, ग), घ, ङ, and q used
by Samagrami, in his edition, published in the Bib. Ind.

b. Two recensions.

The manuscripts fall into two distinet groups : M 2, M 3, W 1. W 2, W 3
and # form one family group, and M 1, M4, C1, C2, C3, C4, S, W 4;
A, B, E; æ, q, W, g, and 4 the other. The former may be called the
shorter recension, the latter the longer. The chief reason for calling the
former group the shorter recension is that at the end of every section the
explanation is more concise than in the other. The latter not only gives
an extended explanation at the end of every section, but also adds the
number of the words enumerated in the section. Besides, at the end of
every chapter, it gives a summary of the sections by quoting the first word
of every section, and adds the number of the sections in the chapter. In
many sections the shorter recension gives fewer words. It is difficult to
decide which of these two represents the original. But as far as the
longer explanation at the end of every section is concerned, it is quite
obvious that it is a later addition. The evidence of the manuscripts shows
that this addition was gradual. For instance, let us take the first section
of the first chapter. All the manuscripts of the shorter recension agree in
giving the text as follows: गोत्रेति पृथिव्या: Manuscript W 2 gives the
number of the section only, i.e. It 9 II, and throughout it follows this method,
which seems to have been the original one. Gradually a change was
introduced : along with the number of the section, the number of the words
in the section was added, and a numerical figure placed immediately before
the number of the section, as the evidence of manuscripts M 2 and W 8
indicates, in the first section of the first chapter, N34 is placed before
141 ic गोत्रेति पृथिव्या: tsa 41 In this connexion it is interesting to
note that manuscripts W 1 and M 3 at first agree with W 2, but gradually

come round to the side of M 2 and W 8. - The next stage of development is
marked by the incorporation of the numerical word in substitution for the

 


10 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIGHANTU

figure in the body of the explanation, as II गोत्रित्येकविंशति: पृथिव्या: ॥. This
is most clearly seen in the sections containing verbs, for instance, in see. 16
of the first chapter, all the stages appear very clearly :

८. द्युमदिति ॥ १६॥ W I, Wo.

b. f ॥ ११॥ १६॥ ) २, M 3, W 3.

E; घुमक्खिकग्ट्श ज्वलतिकमाण: ॥ १६॥ Manuseripts of longer recension.

From the verbs the process was extended by analogy to nouns, perhaps
in imitation of Yaska's own words or for the sake of parallelism,

was also introduced. Last of all came the summary and the
statement of the sections in every chapter.

Yaska's deseription of the Nighaontu | Semammayah Sumamuatah | Sw
vyakhyatuvryah ^ N. l. 1.1-and taking into consideration the fact that in
some cases, like that of Nighantu II. 6, 8, 11, te., his only explanation is
that a particular word has so many synonyms-suits the shorter recension
better, for in the case of the longer recension such an explanation is super-
fluous. NWighantu II. 11, the shorter recension reads @t, while
the longer has: शङ्खारर्गेति नव गोनामानि, 90 only explanation
(N. 8. 9) is: गोनग्मग्न्युंत्तराक्कुण नव. To call this the explanation of the
longer recension is absurd, while in the case of the shorter recension it may
he accepted as an explanation to a certain extent.

c. Devariaja and his commentary.

Devarajayajvan explains every single word of the Nighartu ; his com-
mentary therefore is valuable, for it shows the state of the Nighantu in his
day. - Moreover, in the introduction to his Commentary, he gives a general
description of the many manuscripts of the Nighantuw known to him. He

says: तेषु च केषुचिदयेषु लेखकप्रमादादिमि: कानिचित्पदाव्यधिकान्यासन् । अन्येषु च
। अपरेषु च कानिचिदपहाय कानिचित् विश्रस्तानि । अक्षराणि च
विपर्यस्तानि । एवं व्याकीर्णेषु कोशेषु नियमेकभूतस्य प्रतिपदनिर्वैचननियसप्रदर्शनपरस्य
वांस्यचिद् व्याख्यानस्याभावात् काण्डमुत्सन्नप्रायमासीत् ।

He has attempted to supply a critical edition, for he says that Yaska
explained 150 words of the Naighunrtuka Kondo, and Skandasvami, in
his commentary on Väska, added some more, bringing the total to 200, so
the evidence of Yaskn and Skandasvami was very valuable for these 200
words. About the "९05 )6 ऽऽ: अन्येषां च पदानामस्मत् कुले समामस्नाया-
ध्ययनस्याविच्छेदात्-श्रीवेङ्कटाचार्यतनयस्य माधवस्य भाष्यकृतौ नामानुक्रमण्या आख्या-
तानुक्रमण्या: स्वरानुक्रमण्या निपातानुक्रमण्या निर्बन्धामुक्रमण्यास्तदीयस्य भाष्यस्य च

बहुपा: पयालोचनात् वहुदेशसमानीतात् वहुकोशनिरोक्षणाञ्च पाठ: संशोघित: ।

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE MANUSCRIPTS 11

Devaräja has frequently given the readings of former commentators
like Skandasvaini, Bhatta Bhaskarami$ra, and Madhava, when he differed
from them. His commentary has therefore the value of a collation of
a number of manuscripts, brought as he says from various parts of the
country, and also of the collation of former commentaries. I have care-
fully examined it and noted all the differences, as the foot-notes to the text
will show.

d. Roth's edition of the Nighantu.

Roth examined the commentary of Devarija, but the manuscripts which
he used were probably defective, so that his results are unsatisfactory.
Often he attributes readings to Devaraja which are not to be found in the

published text of that commentator; for instance (I. 11) the reading HT
is attributed to Devaraja, who actually reads HT:; he also passes over
variants given by Devarä&ja. Devar&ja gives WwWT as a variant for wW4I,
which Roth does not mention. Devaräja gives «T (I. 12) as a
different reading, which Roth again does not notice. Devargja gives HH:
for GH:, which Roth ignores. Other cases are:

I. 14. Roth attributes Tg: to Dev., who reads Teg:, and gives TT:
as a variant.

I. 18. Dev. gives Ratgg: for T&: as the reading of Madhava, unnoticed
by Roth.

I. 13. Dev. gives Ta@: for @a: as another reading, unnoticed by Roth.
I. 14. Roth attributes to Dev., whose actual reading is

I. 15. Dev. reads for SYHT and gives YYH: as the reading of Skan-
dasvami, unnoticed by Roth.

I. 16. Dev. gives HIWufq as another reading for unnoticed by
Roth.

II. 1. Dev. gives YAHA as the reading of Madhava for Tada, Roth does
not notice it.

II. 5. Dev. gives WW«wq: as a different reading for W:, Roth does not
notice it.

II. 7. Dev. gives H: as the reading of Skandasvami also, but he further
gives Yq: as a variant. Roth does not notice it.
II. 7. Dev. gi es Yd: as a variant for d:, Roth does not notice it.

It is unnecessary to multiply instances, for all such cases can be easily
found in my foot-notes to the text of the Nighantu.

 


13 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIGHANTU

Roth does not give any various readings for the fourth chapter of the
Nighantu, although the evidence of the manuscripts as shown in this
edition proves that there are several such variants.

There are a few inaccuracies of accent, for instance in IIL 13.

अग्नि न ये 1ऽ accented in manuscripts, but not so in Roth's edition.

There is, however, a serious omission in IV. 2. has been omitted
between HEHTW: and That the omission is an oversight appears
from the fact that though this section is stated to contain 84 words, Roth's
edition has only 83. Yaska explains every word of the fourth and fifth
chapters of the Nighontu. -His evidence is therefore particularly valuable

for a critical edition of the fourth and fifth chapters. He gives ¥THTW:
in its proper place and explains it. Both the recensions agree in reading
vv«4IW; between "EHWTN; and sf*£«4;, and the testimony of Devaraja and
Yaska supports this reading 'The omission' in Roth's edition is thus
evidently due to an oversight.

The evidence of Yaska on the fourth and fifth chapters of the Nighantu
indicates that he follows the longer recension. Thus in IV. 1 the shorter

recension gives &f8T:, but Väska reads &f8&W, which is also the reading of
the longer recension. Again < , which is omitted by the shorter recension,

is explained by Yaska. In IV. 2 Ta: is omitted by the shorter recension, but
not by Yaska. Devar&ja has also followed the longer recension, and this
choice seems to be followed by a long line of commentators, and is also, as
Devaraja says, supported by an unbroken tradition in his own family. The
shorter recension has undoubtedly preserved the original form of the text,
at least towards the end of the sections, but the weighty testimony of
'aska is against it. I have therefore given the text and the order in
which the words occur in accordance with the longer recension, though at
the end of every section I have placed side by side the text of both -
recensions.

९. Bib. Ind. edition of the Nighantu.

Samaérami's edition of the Nighantu is useful, for besides publishing
the commentary of Devargja Yajvan it supplies a much larger number of
various readings than Roth. But it suffers from the one defect of present-
ing only Devarija's reading of the text of the Nighantu. The commentary
of Devarija, however valuable as giving the various readings of the
manuseripts of his time, cannot be made the sole basis of an edition of
the Nighantu. Moreover, occasionally the text in this edition contains
words which are not justified either by the evidence of the manuscripts of

' This was admitted, and later on rectified by Roth himself,

 


THE TITLE OF THE WORK 13

both recensions, or even by that of Devarija himself. For instance, on
p. 236, appears the word HHfdq, which does not exist anywhere; again, on
p. 257, we find Hifgfaa instead of the correct form सांचींवितल्लु
rami seems to have used six manuscripts, from which he gives a number
of various readings in foot-notes, but in the constitution of the text he has
consistently followed Devaraja. - Hence it is not a critical edition, from the
point of view of constituting an independent text of the Nighuntu based on
manuscript evidence.

f. The title of the work.

Sayanicarya in the Rqvedabhasgyubhimika has given the title of
Niruktam to this list of words. He says: अथावबोघे निरपेक्षतया पट्जग्त
यत्रोक्तं तन्निरुक्तम् । गौ: । रमा । ज्मा । कसा । क्षा । क्षमा इत्यारभ्य वसव: । वाजिन: ।
देवपत्न्यो देवपत्म्य इत्यन्तो य: पदानां समाम्नाय: समाम्नातस्तस्मिन् ग्रन्थे पदाथीववो-
च्चाय परापेक्षा न विद्यते . . - . . । तदेतन्निरुक्तं त्रिकाएडम् . . . . काण्ड-
चयात्मक एतस्मिन् ग्रन्थे परनिरपेक्षितया पदार्थस्योक्तत्वात् तस्य ग्रन्थस्य निरुक्तत्वमिति ।

Madhusüdanasvämi, the author of the PrasthGnabkeda has also given
the title of Niruktam to this list of words. Similarly Samagrami follows
Sayana in calling the work Nirultam, although he adds in brackets
(Nighantu). Sayana is evidently wrong in giving the title of Nirukiom
to the Semamnaya, for Yaska distinctly states that it is called Nighaontu.
Namammayah samammatah . . . . tam imam Samamnmayam Nighantava
ityaeaksgate t (N. 1. 1). The list of words can only be called Nighantu, and
it is wrong to call it Niruktam ; the term can be applied only
when some etymological explanations are given. Moreover, all the manu-
seripts call it Nighantu.

g. The division of the Nighantu.

The Nighantw contains five chapters, the first three are called the
Naighantuka Kanda, the fourth the Nuigama Kanda, and the fifth the
Daivata Kanda. In other words it may be said that

the Naighantuka Kanda deals with synonyms ;
the Naigama Kand« deals with homonyms ;
the Daivata Kanda deals with deities.

There is some sort of a prineiple discernible in the arrangement of the
synonyms in the first three chapters. / The first chapter deals with physical
things like earth, air, water, and objects of nature like cloud, dawn, day
and night, &e. The second chapter deals with man, his limbs, like arm,
finger, objects and qualities associated with man, such as wealth, prosperity,
anger, battle, &e.

 


14 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIGHANTU

The third chapter deals with abstract qualities such as heaviness,
lightness, &e. The arrangement, of course, is not scientific, nor, in many
cases, even systematic, but it shows at least an attempt to group the
words methodically. The compilation of the Nighontu is the earliest
known attempt in lexicography. In India it marks the beginning of the
Kosa literature, and later Koéas have sometimes been called Nighanrtavus.
The Nighuntu contains only a small number of the words of the Rigveda,
and as it does not contain any explanations of the words collected, in
Sanskrit or any other language, the modern term 'dictionary' cannot be
applied to it, although the can be so called. It should rather be
called a vocabulary, which is a book 'containing a collection of words of
a language, dialect, or subject'-when ' the words are few in number, being
only a small part of those belonging to the subject, or when they are given
without explanation, or some only are explained, or explanations are
partial '.

h. The author of the Nighantu.

Nothing definite is known of the author of the Nighuartu. / There is
a vague reference to the time of its compilation in the Nirukts I. 20,
which attributes the compilation of the Nighontw along with other
Vealaigas to a later generation of the sages who had no direct perception
of dharma (truth).

The following two verses occur in the Moksa parvan of the Muhka-
bhiraila, chapter 342. 86, 87 ;

वृषौ हि भगवान् धर्म: ख्यातो लोकेषु भारत ।
निघण्टुकपदाख्यानि विद्वि मां वृषमुत्तमम् ॥
कपिर्वराह: श्रेष्ठश्च धर्मश्च वृष उच्यते ।

तस्माद वृषाकपिं प्राह कश्यपो मां प्रजापति: ॥

Some conclude from the second verse that Kagyapa," the Prajapati, is
the author of the Nighauntu, for the word vrsakapt occurs in the Nighontu.
It is not safe to build any argument upon such evidence, for supposing that
Kasgyapa did invent the word vrs@kapt he would be the last person to put
his own word in a list of difficult words like those of the Nighonutu. The
Nighantu is probably not the production of a single individual, hut the
result of the united efforts of a whole generation, or perhaps of several
generations.

' The theory of authorship is indeed absurd, and hardly deserves any mention,

but as many people in India believe in it, and seriously put it forward, I thought it necessary
to make a passing reference to it.

 


EARLIER EDITIONS OF THE NIRUKTA 15

THE NIRUKTA

4. Earlier editions of the Nirukta.

The editio princeps of the Nirukt« was brought out by Rudolph Roth,
and published at Gottingen in 1852. - Sanskrit scholarship in Europe was
then in its infancy. The bulk of the Vedic literature was as yet acces-
sible in manuscripts only. - Even the text of the Rgrveda in print was not
available, Max Müller having given to the world the first two volumes
only of his edition of the Rgveda with S&yan&'s commentary." Guides to
Vedie studies which are now indispensable, such as Prof. Macdonell's Vedic
Grammar, and books of reference like Bloomfield's Vedic Concordance, did
not exist at that time. There was not even a good Vedic dictionary.
Taking these facts into consideration, Roth's achievement was remarkable.
He was the first to observe that the text of the Nirukta has been handed
down in two recensions, a shorter and a longer one, and to prepare a critical
edition of the same based on the manuscript material to which he then had
access. - It must be admitted that as far as the text of the Nirukta is con-
cerned Roth's work has not been superseded so far, and this fact alone is
very creditable to the author of a work published nearly 70 years ago,
and speaks highly of the critical judgement exercised by him in the
constitution of the text.

But it is obvious that a work produced under such circumstances and
about three-quarters of a century ago shows certain defects and limitations.
First of all, the materials at his disposal were scanty. For instance, he
seems to have consulted only one manuscript of Durga's commentary, i.e.
MS. Mill 142," by no means an accurate manuscript, and Roth's incorrect
quotations from Durga's commentary, which I have pointed out in my
notes, are perhaps due to the errors of this manuscript. Hence he could
not have found it a very reliable guide. Secondly, many of the then pre-
vailing methods of indicating references are now obsolete, as, for instance,
Roth's division of the Rgveda into Mandala, anmuraka, &e., which has
curtailed, to some extent, the usefulness of his Nachireisung. pp. 217-28.
He gives a list of various readings at the end of the first and the second
part of the Nirwuktu, but does not specify that such and such a variant is
to be found in such and such a manuscript, a very unsatisfaetory method of
procedure, which no modern editor would follow. - Further, Roth has
adopted the text of the longer recension in his edition, but he does not

1 Professor J. Wackernagel has been kind enough to write to me from Bale that as Roth's
Nirukta first began to be printed in 1847, he could not therefore have made use of Max Miller's
edition of the Rgreda, the preface to the first volume of which is dated Oct. 1849.

2 Described by Keith in the Catalogue of Sanskrit Manuscripts in the Bodleian Library,
vol. ii, p. 108.

 


16 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

show any reason for this preference. As proved by me elsewhere, the
longer recension does not represent the original text of the Niruwkta. ।
Again, he divided the parisist«y into two chapters, the 13th and the 14th, |
a division not supported by the evidence of older manuseripts, which makes
the whole of the parisiste to consist of one chapter (the 18th) only. Roth
is also wrong in using the term Natgama Kandam as applicable to the first
three chapters of the Nirukta, the right term being Naighantuka Kandam.
Further, there are some insceuracies in the text of the Nirukta itself, which
I have pointed out in my notes. Again, there is the inexplicable inconsis-
tency in using large type for printing some Vedic quotations, and small
type for others, even when they are of the same length, and are eited from

the same Veda. For instance, the passage र्गोषुत्वे न: प्नट्टित्वे तूयमा र्गह्रि! is
printed in large type and is accented, whilst the immediately following

passage Hla is printed in small type, and is not accented,
although both quotations are from the Rgveda. Other examples are:

a परां सश मा # द्दुभ्राणिं मन्यथा: * 1ऽ 107 large type and accented.
फऽफफं नमो महद्भयो नमो अभकेभ्य: । 15 in small type? and unaccented.
Again, द्बिरक्कुर्च्चट्र्दृया परि वर्ति . . . .! is in large type and accented ;
while uga मित्दन्सत एति - . .
and ग्युंमों य कक्षा fafgata उच्चा is in large type and accented ;
while UW«T^O @if#a Stat:" is in small type and unaccented.
Again, यस्यर्गृमुशन्तं भुंहृरांमृ TI4 " is in large type" and accented;
while त्रि: स्म aig: wit 8uqwJ? is in small type and unaccented.
And T& is in large type and accented;

while Taa =@ yfwat is in small type and unaccented.
In one case, Roth treats both quotations in the same manner:

वम्रोभि: धुत्रभृग्रुर्वीं’ अदानम् '"1ऽ 11 ।''56 type!" and accented. यट्न्युंपजिह्निंवगृ
«gat अति सपेति '"" is also in large type and accented.

1 RV. viii 4.8; N. iii. 20, Roth's ed., p. 62. _ 1° RV. x. 85. 87.

.^ is in small type and unaccented;

° RV. x. 133.1. स Roth's ed., p. 64,
3 RV. i. 126. 7. !? RV. x. 95. 5.
* RV.i. 27.13. '} RV, ji. 12. 1.
5 Roth's ed., p. 63. 14 RV. vi. 66. 9.
$^IV. v. 75. 7. 15 RV. iv. 19, 9,
T RV. vil. 104. 21. !8 Roth's ed., p. 63.
* RV. i. 24. 10, U RV. viii, 102, 21.

? RV. iv. 7. 3.

 


EARLIER EDITIONS OF THE NIRUKTA 17

This practice of Roth is misleading, and is perhaps responsible for the
fact that several Vedie passages printed in small type are omitted as
occurring in the Nirukt« by Bloomfield in his Vedic Concordance; a few
such examples are the following: श्रुणोतु #:," printed in small type
and without accents in Roth's edition," is not mentioned in VC. as being
quoted by Yaska, and similarly-

अभोके चिदुलोकछृत् ?

गातुं छृणवन्नुषसो जनाय *
कुत्साय मन्मन्नह्यश्च *

gat 19 «ar: «g विस्रुह: '

and also YET » fragment of RV. I. 164. 12, and quoted in
the Viruktu 4. 27, and Taft@yYa:, a fragment of VS. 7. 1, quoted in N.5. 6,
are ignored. (Besides the reference of ut मृत्यो अनुपरेहि पन्था is wrong
in VCS It is quoted in N. 11. 7, and not in N. 10. 7, as stated there.
Also the reference to शूर YTTETIA® is wrong in VC,, where it is
RV. III. 46. 3, while the correct reference is RV. III. 41. 3. Other cases

are: Ya Ta UTY «tat u&, RV. III. 30. 19c, is wrongly given as IV. 30.
19° in VC, ef. p. 285 *; the reference of @t a atida@fa UTY: is wrongly
given as IX. 63. 5® in VC., p. 986", while the correct reference is VII. 68.5 ®,)

The Bib. Ind. Edition of the Niruktu.

This was published at Calcutta under the editorship of Samasrami from
1882-91. Its chief merit is that it, for the first time, supplies us with the
commentary of Devardja Yajvan on the Nighaontu and of Durgeo on the
Nirukta. It also adds an index to the words of the Nighantw as well as to
the words of the Nirukta. The practical utility of this index, however,
suffers much from its being separated into three indexes, one for each
volume and not consisting of one single whole. Besides many misprints
and errors of SundkZ, the text constituted is not very valuable from the
critica! point of view, and is thus not a trustworthy basis for further
research. 'The editor, although his text generally agrees with the shorter

! RV. vi. 55. 5; N. iii, 16 ; VC., p.1052 b. __ p. 328 b.

* Roth's ed., p. 60, 6 RV, vi. 7. 6; N. vi. 3; Roth's ed., p. 91;
3 RV. x.133.1; N. iii. 20; Roth's ed., p.62; _ VC., p. 839 b.
VC., p. 95 b. T RV. x. 81. 1; N. xi. 7.
4 RV. iv. 51.1: N. iv. 25; Roth's ed., p. 74; * Cf. Bloomfield, Vedic Concordance, p. 566 b.
VC., p. $46 b. * RV. iii 41. 3; N. iv. 19.

5 RV. iv. 138. 1; N. iv. 25; loc. cit., VC., » Cf. p. S97 b.

 


18 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

recension, does not seem to realize that there are two recensions of the
text of the Nirukta, and has thus unconsciously introduced an element of

eclecticism in his edition. - For instance, he omits the phrase: TFT:
(vol. ii, p. 49), probably on account of its being not found in the manu-

scripts of the shorter recension, but he puts the line Y¥4THT:

¥Jatay (vol. ii, p. 132) within brackets in his constituted
text, although it is omitted by manuscripts of the shorter recension.

Further, he omits the passage: yat at fagatfa वा क्षा क्षीयते रनिवासकर्मण:
from his text, adding it in a footnote with the remark: पाठ:
(vol. ii, p. 181). This shows that he does not follow any general plan
with regard to the additional passages of the longer recension, as he some-
times puts them within brackets in the text itself, and sometimes adds
them in foot-notes. This would also imply that he does not regard the
passage, which he puts within brackets, as interpolations, but only those
which he adds in foot-notes; this, to say the least of it, is altogether an
arbitrary distinction, made with reference to the additional passages of the
longer recension. Further, he is not consistent even in this, for occasionally
he puts passages of the shorter recension within brackets as well (see
vol. iii, pp. 121-22). Examples might be multiplied. Both these editions
(i.e. Roth and Bib. Ind.) are very meagrely punctuated, and many
sentences, being not properly divided, are misleading or tend to be obscure.

The Bombay. Edition.

Another exeellent edition of the NirwM«, together with Durga's
commentary, is that of Mahämahopadhy&ya, P. Sivadatta, published at
Bombay in 1912. In type, in paper, and in general get-up it marks a
distinct improvement on its predecessors. The sentences are intelligently
divided, and, to a great extent, the obscurities due to defective punctuation
in previous editions have been removed. The text followed is that of the
longer recension, and the criticism to which Roth's text is subject, except
his inconsistency with regard to the use of large and small type, is applic-
able to the Bombay edition as well. The editor does not state whether he
uses any manuseripts or not in the constitution of his text. As a matter
of fact, as expressly mentioned in his introductory remarks, he has taken
the two previous editions as the basis of his own work. A critical edition
of the Nirukta professing to represent the archetype as closely as possible,
and based on the manuscript material hitherto not utilized is therefore still

a desideruatum. I have, on these grounds, undertaken to edit the Nirukta
afresh.

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS 19

Detailed Description of Manuscripts.'
MS. - Maz Miller Memorial, e. 8. _ M 1.
Part I. a.p. 1749.

Contents: The Nirukta of Yaska in the longer recension, the text of
which consists of two manuscripts, containing the two parts (the paurvardha
and the respectively. 'The work is divided into chapters
{(adhyayas) and sections (khandus) thus: Chapter I, which contains 20 see-
tions, begins on f. 1 v. and ends on £.10 r. Chapter II, 28 sections, ends on
f. 21 r. Chapter III, 22 sections, ends on f. 82 v. Chapter IV has 27
sections, and ends on f. 42 v. Chapter V, 28, sections, ends on f. 58 v.
Chapter VI, 36 sections, ends on f. 68 r. The chapters are written consecu-
tively, and at the end of each chapter there is added a short summary,
quoting the first word or words of every section-thus indicating and also
expressly stating the number of sections in the chapter. The text is
bounded on both sides by double red lines, sometimes carelessly drawn,
regularly up to £. 25 r., after which similar red lines only occasionally appear.
A short red vertical stroke is placed above the letter where it indicates the
application of the rules of euphonic combination, and is also used to mark
the termination of a sentence, being thus a sign of punctuation. The
danda appears at the end of a section only, but also points out the begin-
ning and ending of a quotation. The red vertical stroke is often confusing
as the accent in Vedic quotations is also marked with red ink.

There are two figures drawn vertically in red ink on f. lr. One looks
like a goddess, probably Durga, seated in a chariot with a flying banner,
the other is the god Ganes@, seated on an ornamented lotus, to which is
added in black ink the representation of a small bird, probably a peacock.

The two figures contain between them the words: (sic) I fWam फ्लेपदू

प्रारभ: ॥ An attempt has been made to colour ff. 14, 29, 42, 49, 64 with
yellow pigment, which is frequently used also to obliterate, though only
with pfu'tlal success, individual words, syllables, and letters. Black pig-
ment is also employed to obliterate, for instance on f. 24 v., where half
a line is completely covered. 'The manuscript is neat, well preserved, and
accurate. -It is the best among those belonging to the longer recension.

! From the point of view of the general reader, the detailed description of the manuscripts
can be much curtailed. But as the manuscripts of the Max Miller Memorial and Chandra
Shum Shore collections have not been so far catalogued, this description, in addition to
supplying information with regard to the manuscripts material available for a critical
edition, is also intended to serve the purpose of a descriptive catalogue. And as Professor
A. A. Macdonell is in favour of it, I have retained the whole of it, without any curtailment,

B 2

 


20 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Size: 84" x 84".

Material : Paper.

Number of leaves : ii. + 68.

Number of lines per folio: 9; ff. 8 v.-13 v. have 10 lines each.

Character :

Date: On fol. 68 r.: (sic) wa a6oa (-^.D. 1749
आश्चीनवद्यतृतीयाद्दिने लिखितं (.७. on the third day in the first fort-

night of the month of Asvan).

Scribe: On f. 68 .: (#6) कासीनाथ अनंत पुस्तकं लिख्यते शरी सदाशिवार्पणमस्तु॥
॥ शी ॥ क ॥. He seems to be a faithful copyist, for he remarks (sic):

यादृशं पुस्तकं दृष्टा तादृशं लिखितं मया ।
यदि शुद्धमशुद्धं वा मम दोष न विद्यते ॥

of spelling: ¢ is doubled in conjunction, e.g. tya =

Part IL &. 3. 1775.

Contents: The Nirukte of Yaska, Chapters VII-XIII, in the longer
recension. The text is divided into chapters (adhyd@yas and khandas), and
sections thus: Chapter VII has 31 sections, begins on f. 1 v. and ends on
f. 11 r. Chapter VIII has 22 sections, and ends on f. 16 r. Chapter IX
has 48 sections, and ends on f. 24 r. Chapter X has 47 sections, and ends
on f. 38 r. Chapter XI has 50 sections, and ends on f. 48 v. Chapter XII
has 46 sections, and ends on f. 54 v. Chapter XIII has 50 sections, and
ends on f. 70 r. The so-called two chapters of the parisiste are treated
as one. All the chapters are written consecutively without a break.

Chapter VII begins with ची गणेशाय नम: ॥ श्री वेदपुरुषाय नम:॥ Chapters
VIII and X begin with I ET: औओ३म्॥ Chapter IX with ॥ श्री हरि: ओ ३म्॥
Chapter XI with कृ ॥ श्री विठलप्रसन्न ॥ कछृ॥ Chapter XII with I GI, and
Chapter XIII with I Ht t ऊ ॥. ६8००, 14 of the thirteenth chapter also

begins with Nl The last word of the 18th section of the same
chapter is repeated. At the end of cach chapter a short summary, which
quotes the first word or words of each section and states the number of
sections in the chapter, is subjoined. 'The text is bounded on both sides by
double red lines from f. 11 r. to f. 88 v. Punctuation is similar to that of
Part I. Ff. 6 r-10 v. do not give the Vedie stanza in full in the text
itself, where the first few words only of the stanza are written, while the
remaining part of the stanza is added in the margin. Black pigment is
used to obliterate a part of the line on ft. 60 v. and 68 r. F. 66 is coloured
light blue. This is also a neat, well-preserved, and accurately written
manuseript.

Size: 83" x 847, and after £. 82, 84" x 82",

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS Si

Material: Paper.

Number of leaves : 70 --ii blank.

Number of lines per folio: 9.

Character: Devanagari.

Date: On f. 70 r. (sic) संवत् १८॥ ३१ (= ^.०. 1773) विश्वावसु संघत्सरे 84
*I] 43 (i.c. finished on the thirteenth day of the bright fortnight of the
month of Caitra).

Seribe : On {. 70 r.:

Although these two parts are brought together in the same volume in
order to make up the text of the they are not related to each
other exeept in so far as they both belong to the longer recension. They
were copied at different times as their respective dates show. And the
fact that the first part uses the Saka era, while the seeond, the Vikrama
era, indicates that the former comes from the south, while the latter from
the north. For the sake of convenience I have used the sign M l for both
these parts.

MS,. - Maz iilley Memorial, त. 23. M2.

Contents: The first half (Chapters I-VI) of the Nirukt« in the longer
recension. The text is divided into chapters and sections thus: Chapter I
begins with शरो गणॆशाय नम: ॥ ०० ।. 1 v., has 20 sections, and ends on f. 10 r.
Chapter II has 28 sections, and ends on f. 19 r. Chapter III has 22 see-
tions, and ends on £. 27 v. Chapter IV has 27 sections, and ends on f. 35 v.
Chapter V has 28 sections, and ends on f. 44 r. Chapter VI has 36 see-
tions, and ends on f. 55 v. The text is bounded on both sides by double
red lines. - Punctuation is similar to M 1... The Vedic stanzas are not given
in full, but the word @ is added after the first two or three words of the
quotation thus: f. 5 r. कर्णवन्त: ॥ ऋक ॥ In Sendhi the sign of

the elision of short @ is retained, but not always, e.g. £. * '. वर्धतेऽ पक्षीयते
and [oc. eit. 2 Ff. 5, 10, 15, 20, 258, 30, 85, 40, 45, 50, i.e. every fifth
except the last is coloured with yellow pigment.

It is a very neat and beautifully written and modern manuseript.

Size 103" x 44".

Material : Paper.

Number of leaves : ii +55 + ii blank.

Number of lines: 9.

Character : Devanagari.

Date : Not given, but looks modern.

Seribe: Not known.

The eolophon runs: Ta निरुक्ते षष्ठो ऽध्याय: ॥ शुभ भवतु ॥

 


$2 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

MS. Maz iiller Memorial, d. 24. MS.

Contents: The Nirukto of Yaska in the shorter recension. The
purisista is treated as one chapter, and all the 13 chapters are written
consecutively, the purrardha being separated from the only by
the words: (sic) I Ta @: I The text is divided into adhy@yas, padas,
and khandas thus: Chapter I begins on £. 1 v. with the words I Zt
«4; II has 4 padas, which end on ff. 3 r., 7 r., 9 v., and 11 v. respectively.

The sections are numbered continuously-the numbering of sections in
each pada being not afresh, but the continuation from the previous section
-thus Chapter I has 27 sections; the Ist pada comes to an end after the
5th section; 2nd pada after the 15th section; the 3rd pada after the 21st
section; and the 4th pada after the 27th section. Chapter II has 7 padas:
1st pada has 7 sections, and end on {. 14 r.; 2nd pada has 5 sections, and
ends on f. 16 r.; 8rd pada has 3 sections, and ends on f. 17 r. (where it is

wrongly stated | तृतीयस्यग्र्द्ध: 1); 4th pada has 7 sections, and ends on ।. 18 v.;
5th pada has 3 sections, and ends on f. 19 v. ; 6th pada has 5 sections, and
ends on f. 21 r.; 7th pada has 6 sections, and ends on £. 23 v. Sections in this
chapter are not numbered continuously, but at the end of the chapter;

the total number of the sections is stated thus: (sic) पाद: । खांडकां

3§ | faediat=zta:. Chapter III has 4 pads; the Ist pade has 7 sections,
and ends on f. 26 r.; the 2nd pada has 6 sections, and ends on f. 29 v.; the
3rd pada has 6 sections, and ends on f. 32 r.; the 4th pada has 6 sections,
and ends on f.85 r. As in Chapter II, the total number of sections is
stated to be 25. Chapter IV has 4 p£das; the 1st pada has 8 sections, and
ends on f. 37 v.; the 2nd pada has 8 sections, and ends on £. 40 r; the 3rd
pada has 6 sections, and ends on f. 43 r; the 4th pade has 7 sections, and
ends on f. 45 v. As before, the total number of sections is given in the
colophon on f. 45 v. as 29. Chapter V has 4 p&das; the Ist pada has 6
sections, and ends on f. 48 v.; the 2nd p&d« has 8 sections, and ends on
{. 51 v.; the 3rd pada has 7 sections, and ends on f. 54 r.; the 4th pada
has 10 sections, and ends on f. 57 v.; the total number of sections being
given as 31. Chapter VI has 5 padas; the lst pada has 5 sections, and
ends on f. 60 r.; the 2nd pada has 13 sections, and ends on f. 65 v.; the
3rd pada has 8 sections, and ends on f. 68 v.; the 4th pada has 5 sections,
and ends on f. 70 v.; the 5th pada has 8 sections, and ends on f. 73 v.; the
total number of sections, i.e. 39, being added in the colophon, which runs
as follows: (sic) पंचस: पाद: ॥ षष्ठोध्याय: । षांड्यकां ३९ ॥ क ॥६॥ इति अर्द्ध: ॥
Chapter VII has 7 padas; the lst pada has 5 sections, and ends on £.75v.:
the 2nd pade has 3 sections, and ends on f. 76 v. (wrongly numbered

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS 28

as 75 on the restored part); the 3rd pade has 10 sections, and ends on
f. 79 r.; the 4th pada has 5 sections, and ends on f. 80 v.; the 5th padu
has 3 sections, and ends on f. 81 v.; the 6th pada has 9 sections, and ends
on f. 83 v.; the 7th pada has 9 sections, and ends on f, 86 v.; the total
number of seetions, i.e. 44, is added in the colophon. Chapter VIII has
3 pädas«; the Ist pada has 4 sections, and ends on f. 88 v.; the 2nd pada
has 12 sections, and ends on f. 91 v.; the 8rd pada has 7 sections, and ends
on f. 93 v.; the total number of sections, 23, is stated in the colophon as
before. Chapter IX has 4 padas; the lst pade has 10 sections, and ends
on f. 96 r.; the 2nd pade has 11 sections, and ends on f. 98 v.; the 8rd
pada has 13 sections, and ends on f. 102 r.; the 4th pada has 9 sections,
and ends on f. 104 r.; the total number of sections being 48. Chapter X
has 4 paddas; the ist pada has 13 sections, and ends on f. 108 r.; the 2nd
pada has 11 sections, and ends on f. 110 v.; the 3rd pada has 13 sections,
and ends on f. 114 r.; the 4th pada has 10 sections, and ends on £. 116 v.;
the total number of sections being 47. Chapter XI has 4 padas ; the 1st
pada has 12 sections, and ends on f. 119 r.; the 2nd pade has 9 sections,
and ends on f. 121 v.; the 3rd pade has 13 sections, and ends on £. 125 r.
(the colophon is completely obliterated with black pigment); the 4th pada
has 16 sections, and ends on f. 128 v.; the total number of sections being
50. Chapter XII has 4 padas; the lst pada has 11 sections, and ends on
f. 181 v.; the 2nd pada has 8 sections, and ends on £. 133 v.; the 8rd padu
has 15 sections, and ends on £. 136 v.; the 4th pada has 12 sections, and ends
on f. 140 r.; the total number of sections, as stated in the eolophon, is 46.
Chapter XIII. written conseeutively, has 4 pædas; the 1st p&«d« has 18
seetions-the last word of the 13th seetion is repeated, a sign of the
termination of the chapter-and ends on f. 144 r.; the 2nd pade has 19
sections, and ends on f. 152 v.; the 8rd pada has 9 sections, and ends on
£, 155 r.; the 4th p@da has 7 sections, and ends on f. 157 v.

It marks the accent not only on Vedic stanzas, but on fragments of
Vedie quotations also, several words preceding the quotation are similarly

marked. - The dand«a appears at the end of a section, or the beginning and
end of a quotation.

Size: 937 x 84".

Material: Paper.

Number of leaves: ii +157 + ii blank.
Number of lines: 8; f. 157 has 9 lines.
Character : Devanagari.

Date : Not given, but rather old.
Scribe: Not known.

 


24 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Injuries : It is a very much injured manuscript ; £. 12 is torn on the left-
hand side, and the text is restored on a patched-up piece of paper; a part
of fi. 23 and 52 is injured and the text is similarly restored; on £. 153 v.
and 154 v. the right half is restored ; £. 157 is restored in a different hand-
writing. - Besides, the leaves are torn in innumerable marginal spaces, but
without injuring the text.

Peculiarity of spelling: It has preserved the old calligraphy. Some of
the chief peculiarities are: ¥ with 3 is sometimes written as %R; e.g. f. 1 v.,
line 5, WWIW is written W*HW. - Cf. also f. l v., line 6.

"T is written as TW; e. g. f. 1 v., line 5, तत्रे = 4qt4 ; f. 2 v., line 1, 8844 -*aTWq ;
f. 68 r., line 2, 8wwT: - TW«wT;, and so on.

T is occasionally written as 1/ e.g. f. 2 r, line 5, qe-WTg and जायते
- SITHI4, line 6. वर्धते = वघात ; 1. ? ४.. 8, व्यपित्येतस्य = व्यपात्यतस्य.

But in the case of U this method is not always adhered to; occasionally
C is written in the ordinary way, e.g., f. 2 v., line 5, ६. । ।।। ब not
अवागार्थ ; ।. ? ४. line 7, णुंजतथिं and ५० पूजितार्थ ; f. 63 r., line 2, यदन्ये and
यदान्य, YIG: and 0" व्याययु: .

sif is written as TsiT, e.g., f. 2 1., line 1, गौ: =1गो:, ।ए९ ९, वचनमौदुंबरायण:
= line 8, «ihratat =

Occasionally W is written like w, and the sign of S in conjunction is
added, not at the bottom, but on the side of a letter; e.g., f. 1 v., line 8,

इत्य पमन्यवो = इत्योद्युमन्यवो; but f. 2 r, line 1. Y&¥T is written in the ordinary
way ; f. 1 v., line 3, स्यु: = स्या:.

q is written as a short horizontal stroke in conjunction with other
letters ; e. g., f. 1 v., ।156 ४ चत्वारि = चञ्चारि, 10० 6, सत्व = सच्च; f. 2 r, line 5,
अक्विच्चग्ह्नग्त्मि ; f. 1 v., line 7, मूर्त्त = मूत्रं

त् 15 occasionally written as a short horizontal stroke, even when it is
not a conjunct consonant; e. g., f. 2 r., line 2, चतुष्टुं=चत्तुष्टुं, but in eonjune-
tion with w it is written in the ordinary way; e.g., cf. Kf@@ above, and
wgu&«p, f. l v. dine 6. There is dittography also, e.g. f. 2 », line 3,
युगपदुत्पन्नान्नां.

The manuscript belongs to a period when calligraphy was still in a
process of transition, consequently it preserves the old and new forms of
letters side by side; it cannot therefore be later than the fifteenth century.
I think that among the manuscripts of the Nirukia in the Bodleian this is
the oldest and best manuseript belonging to the shorter recension.

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS 25

MS. - Maz Milley Memorial, e. 9. M4.

Contents : The Nirukta (7-14 chapters; the purisista is treated as two
chapters) in the longer recension. 'The text is punctuated with a short
and vertical stroke, indicating Sawiwlhi and the termination of a sentence,
while the dandu appears at the end of a section, or the commeneement
and end of a quotation. Accent is marked with red ink in Vedie quota-
tions. - The work is divided into chapters and sections, thus : Chapter VII

begins with 11 t TMT @a: I Ef€: #A I on f. l v., has 31 sections, and
ends on f. 15 v. Chapter VIII has 22 sections, and ends on f. 28 v.;
Chapter IX has 48 sections, and ends on f. 85 r. Chapter X has 47
sections, and ends on f. 49 r. Chapter XI has 50 sections, and ends on
f. 61 v. Chapter XII has 46 sections, and ends on f. 75 r. - Chapter XIII
has 13 sections, and ends on f. 79 v. Chapter XIV has 37 sections, and
ends on f. 96 ४. All the 14 chapters are written consecutively, and at the
end of cach chapter a summary similar to that described on p. 1 is added.

Size: 11" x 5".

Material : paper.

Number of leaves : ii 4+ 96 + ii blank.

Number of lines: 7.

Character : Devanagari.

Date: Not given.

Seribe: Not known.

The colophon on £. 96 r. runs as follows: I €&f4 fweum पर्णिशांठंशुत्तुर्दृशो’
घ्याय: ॥ १४॥ शी रामजयरामजयजयराम #if I

It is a neat, well-written, fairly accurate, and modern manuseript.
» [ Y »

MS. - Chandra Shwim Shere, d. 178. C 1.

The text of the Nirukta is made up of two different manuscripts, which
contain Chapters I-VI and VII-XII respectively, but both are incomplete,
and both belong to the longer recension. The two parts are separated
by a fragment of a third manuscript (ff. 38-43), which gives a part of
Chapters XI and XII The fragment has no value for the purpose of
collation, and is therefore ignored.

Part I,

Contents: The Nirukte (Chapters I-VI) in the longer recension.
The text is divided into chapters and sections thus: Chapter I begins on
f. 1 v., has 20 sections, and ends on £. 7 v; Chapter II has 28 sections, and
ends on f. 12 r.; Chapter III has 22 sections, and ends on f. 18 v.;

 


26 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Chapter 1V has 27 sections, and ends on £.25 r.; Chapter V has 28 sections,
and ends on f. 30 r.; Chapter VI has 35 sections only, the remaining
sections are missing. The text is bounded on both sides by double red
lines ff. 1-21; by double black lines ff. 11 r, 17 v, and 22-86; ।. 12 is
written in a different handwriting. 'The accent is marked in red ink in
Vedic stanzas only. - Double short vertical red strokes are used to indicate
sandhi and the end of a sentence, which are replaced by similar black
strokes from f. 7 v.-f. 12 r., which are again replaced by a similar single
red stroke ff. 19-30. The danda, as usual, appears at the end of a section
only, or at the commencement and the termination of a quotation. The
chapters are written consecutively. - Numerous notes are added on the
marcin, and sometimes between the lines of the text also, c.g. ff. 2, 3, 12,
18 v., 19. At the end of each chapter a short summary, as deseribed on
page 1, is subjoined :

Size 18" x 55.

Material: paper.

Number of leaves: 1 +86 +1 blank.

Number of lines: 10 f. 1-25; 11 #. 26-88.

Character: Devanägari.

Date: The last leaves of the manuseript are missing; neither the date
nor the name of the seribe is known. - From its appearance the manuseript
looks old, f. 8 is numbered as f. 9, and f. 9 as f. 11, and the mistake con-
tinues up to the end ; the reference to folios are therefore to the number
added in peneil.

Injuries: It is injured in many places, c.g. #. 7-12 on the top (left).

Part II.

Contents: The uttarardhu of the Nirukt« (Chapters VII-XII) in the
longer recension. The text is divided into chapters and sections thus:
Chapter VII begins on f. l v. with the words I सो गणेशाय नम: ॥ q has
31 sections, and ends on f. 11 r (- f. 54 r.); Chapter VIII has 22 scetions,
and ends on f. 15 v. (- f. 58 v.); Chapter IX has 48 sections, and ends on
f. 23 v. (-f. 66 v.); Chapter X has 47 sections, and ends on f. 32 r. (-f. 75 r.);
Chapter XI has 30 sections, and ends on f. 40 v. (- f. 83 v.); Chapter XII
has 48 sections only, and ends on f. 48 v. (- f. 91 v.); the remaining portion
of the mannseript is missing. - All the chapters are written consecutively,
and at the end of each chapter a summary similar to that of Part I is
added. The text is bounded on both sides by two sets on double black
lines, ff. 1-84 (ff. 44-77) and ft. 41-48 (ff. 84-91); and by similar red lines
f. 35-40 (ff. 78-83). The accent is marked in red ink in Vedic stanzas

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS SZ

only, and a short vertical red stroke is occasionally used for punctuation ;
the use of the danda is similar to that of Part I. F. 9 (=f. 52) is written
in a different handwriting.

Size: 114%," x 43".

Material: paper.

Number of leaves: 48 +i blank,

Number of lines : 9-10.

Character: Devanägari.

Date: The last part of the manuseript is missing; consequently the
date and the name of the scribe are not known.

Injuries : ff. 18 (- 61), 34-40 (= 77-83) are slightly injured in the top
margin; f. 22 (= 65) is practically defaced by black and yellow ink, and
f. 28 (- 71) by water.

MS. Shwm Shere, d. 181. C 2.

"The text is made up of two different manuseripts.

Part },

Contents: The pürv&rdha of the Nirukta in the longer recension. The
manuscript is fragmentary and incomplete, containing Chapters I, IV, V,
and a part of the first section of the VI. The text is divided into chapters
and sections. Chapter I has 20 sections, and ends on f. 18 v. Chapter IV
has 27 sections, and ends on f. 26 r. Chapter V has 28 sections, and ends
on f.40 r. The accent is marked in red ink in Vedic stanzas only, while
a short vertical red stroke is used for punctuation. The words (sic)

इति नोरूक्ते पुर्वषट्टे प्रथमोध्याय: ॥ are wrongly added at the bottom of £. 1 v. in

a different handwriting. क'. 17. has a figure of Ganesa drawn rather
crudely in red with two female attendants.

Size: 18%" x52".

Material : paper.

Number of leaves : 1 +40.

Number of lines: 7-8.

Character : Devanagari.

Date and seribe: Not known.

Injuries: ff. 13-14 are slightly injured by worms. It looks modern.
The numbering in the original is wrong; the reference is to the number
added in peneil. It is full of mistakes.

Peculiarity of spelling: f. 2, l. 1 HSWT is written as व्रज्यँ, f. 2, l. 1 गौ is
written as If,

 


S8 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Part IL

Contents: The wuttarardha of the Nirukta (Chapters VII-XIII) in the
longer recension. The text is divided into chapters and sections thus:
Chapter VIL has 31 sections, and ends on f. 6 v. (= 46 v.); the colophon

adds: Ht TTHT I® i Chapter VIII has 22 sections, and ends on
f. 10 ». (- 50 r.); Chapter IX has 43 sections, and ends on f. 15 r. (= 55 r.):
Chapter X has 47 sections, and ends on £.20 v (= 60 v.); Chapter XI has
50 sections, and ends on f. 26 v. (= 66 v.); Chapter XII has 46 sections,
and ends on £. 32 r. (= 72 r.); Chapter XIII begins on f. 32 v. (- 72 v.),
has 18 sections, and ends on f. 34 v. (= 74 v.); the colophon runs (sic)
॥ इति निरुक्ते उत्तरषटकॆ सप्तमोध्याय: ॥ छ॥ शुभं भवतु ॥ छ॥ श्री महागणपतये नम: ॥
the last chapter, which is also named XIII, has 37 sections, which are not
numbered anew, but continuously from the previous section, and ends on
f.42 r. (= 82 r.). - Chapters VIII-XII are written consecutively, and
a summary, similar to the one described on p. 1, is added at the end of each
chapter, but the summary on £142 r. (- 821.) also includes that of the first
13 sections, although the summary of these sections is already subjoined on
f. 34 v. (- 74 v.).

The colophon on £. 42 r (= 82 r) runs ए5: ॥ इति निरुक्ते त्रयोदशोध्याय: ॥
The text is bounded on both sides by double black lines, ff, 1-23 (= 41-63)
and ff. 38-42 (=78-82) by similar red lines, ff. 24-36 (=64-76), £. 87 (=77)
is coloured yellow. A short vertical red stroke is employed for punetua-
tion, the dropping of visarga is indicated by adding them on the top of

the letter just before the red stroke, eg. f. 1 v. (= 41 v.), l. &; प्रत्यक्षतां

आध्यात्मि॰ ; ८. ८८८. ।. 4; पृथिव्यङ्कृ इंद्रम॰ ; op. cit. 1.8: 'ga4atat , and
so on.

Occasionally the short red stroke is written I$, but the sign $ is not

- . 8 . & 1§ n» a
meant to point out the elision of short a, e.g. op. cif. 1. ö: प्रर्वरेचमि'द्रृ.

Sometimes & is replaced by x. The appears at the end of a section,
or at the beginning and end of a quotation. The accent is marked in red
ink on Vedic stanzas.

Size: 18%" x 53".

Material : paper.

Number of leaves: 42 +i blank.

Number of lines: 12-17.

Character : Devanagari.

Date and seribe: Not known.

Injuries : f. 1 (= 41), ff. 21-22 (= 61-22), £, 23 (- 88) are slightly injured.

It is a neat, but closely written manuscript.

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS कि

MS. Shum Shere, d. 182. CB.

The text of the Nérukta is made up of two manuscripts.

Parr I.

Contents: The parvardha of the Nirukta in the longer recension. The
work is divided into chapters and sections thus: Chapter I begins on f. 1 v.

with the words: (sic) It TTW | #71 TTHTY #4:, has 20 sections, and ends
on f. 7 r. Chapter I has 28 sections, and ends on f. 12 r. (ff. 8-9, contain-
ing sections 3-11 of the sccond chapter, are missing in the original).
Chapter III has 22 sections, and ends on f. 18 r. (ff. 19 and 21-23, contain-
ing sections 11-12 and 14-19, are missing in the original). Chapter IV has
27 sections, and ends on f. 23 v. Chapter V has 28 sections, and ends on
f. 29 v. Chapter VI has 86 sections, and ends on f. 38 r. 'The chapters are
written consecutively, the summary is added as usual, punctuation and
accents in Vedic stanzas are marked in red ink. The text is bounded on
both sides by double black lines, f. 1 r. has a few laudatory verses written
on it and the words: (sic) अथ uftantg | हंस शुचिषदिति । ऋक

A part of line 9 on f. 5 r., and of line 4 on f. 7 r., of line 5 on f. 7 v., is
obliterated with black pigment. Two lines are added to the top of f. 13 v.,
f. 19 v. is partially defaced by light red ink, and half a line on f. 20 r. is
similarly obliterated with red pigment. Colophon on f. 88 r. runs thus :

॥ इति निरुक्ते पूरवेषद्के षष्ठो ध्याय: ॥ शरो रामचन्द्राय नम: ॥ शरी विश्वेश्वराय नम: ॥
शुभमस्तु ॥ "It वक्रतुंडग्य नम:॥ A female figure is drawn on f. 38 v., and a list
of several articles is added. The prominent difference of ink, characters,
carelessness, occasionally disproportionate red vertical strokes, frequent
use of red ink for marginal notes, smudging of the black ink, give a very
untidy appearance to the manuscript.

Size: 123" x 54%".

Material: Paper.

Number of leaves : 1+ 838 +i blank.

Number of lines : 10-11.

Character : Devanagari.

Date and scribe: Not known.

The name of the owner is given on f. 1 r. as Godabole Laksmana Bhatta.

Peculiarity of spelling: It occasionally writes T as 7, e. g., f. 1 v., line 1,
शरो रामाय =ञ्री 11814.. Like M 1, it frequently doubles ¢? in conjunction
with other letters, e.g. f. 1 v., line 2, ; line 3, इत्यौप-
मन्यव: = ; 156 4. चत्वारि = चत्त्वारि ; 117९ 8, नित्यं = नित्त्यं .

 


30 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Parm IIL.

Contents: The wttarardha of the Nirukte (Chapters X-XIII) in the
longer recension. The text is divided into chapters and sections thus :
Chapter X begins on f. 1 r. (=40 r.), has 47 sections, and ends on f. 16 v.
(- 55 v.. Chapter XI has 50 sections, and ends on f. 31 v. (- 70 v.).
These two chapters are written consecutively. Chapter XII begins with
॥ श्री गणेशाय नम: ॥ has 46 sections, and ends on f. 13 v. (= 83 v.). This
seems to be a different manuscript from the previous one containing
Chapters X-XI; the pagination begins anew, the handwriting is different,
and unlike the former the text is bounded on both sides by double red lines.
The parisistæ is separated from Chapter XII, and is treated as one chapter.
The numbering of leaves starts anew from the first. It begins with I शरो ॥,
on f. 1 r. (- 84 r.), has 50 sections, and ends on 14 ४. (= 97 ४.). The last
word of the 13th section is repeated, but the summary is added at the
end of the 50th section. The summary, as usual, is added at the end of
every chapter. The accent is marked in red ink in Vedic quotations, while
a short vertical red stroke is used for punctuation. A line in different
handwriting is added at the bottom of f. 1 v. (= 40 v.). A line and a half
in red ink is added on the right-hand margin of f. 22 r. (= 61 r.); part of
the 50th section of the eleventh chapter is finished off on the top and right-
hand margin on f. 31 v. (= 70 v.). A line is added on the top of f. 11 v.
(= 81 v.). Section 43 of Chapter XIII is left out in the text, but added
on the top and the margin on the right on £. 18 r. (= 96 r.).

Size: 9" x 4".

Material: Paper.

Number of leaves: 31418 +12 (= 58) 4+ i blank.

Number of lines: 7 to 9.

Character: Devanagari.

Daio and scribe: Not known; the colophon runs thus: It
उत्तरषट्के सप्तमोध्याय: ॥

Injuries: It is slightly injured by worms in several places, e.g. ff. 7-4
(= 47-54) and ff. 1-8 (= 84-86),

It has a modern look.

MS. Chandra Shum Shere, d. 179. C4.

The text is made up of two manuscripts, containing the purvardke and
the uftwrardhu, with the purisiste respectively, cach being copied by
a different seribe, at a different place and period. They will therefore be
separately described.

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS 31

AMS. 1. a. D. 1629 Copied at Benures.

Contents : The porrardha of the Niruktu in the shorter recension ; the
text is divided into chapters, p@das, and sections, thus: Chapter I has 6
padus; the Ist padu contains 5 sections, and ends on f. 2 v.; it is not
stated where the 2ud pg@d« comes to an end, probably it should be ended
after the 4th section, as the number of the following section begins anew ;
the 3rd pdda has six sections, and ends on f. 6 v.; the 4th pZ/« has 4
sections, and ends on f. 8 r.; the 5th p@dae has 2 sections, and ends on

f.9 v.; the 6th padu has 6 sections, and ends on f. 11 v.; 27 being the
total number of sections given in the colophon, which runs thus:; (sie) It § II

sa 1 Tha Taa प्रथमोध्यायस्य षकम: पाद: ॥ प्रथमोध्याय: समाप्त: ॥

Chapter II has 7 padas: the lst pada contains 7 sections, and ends on
f. 13 v.; 2nd padw contains 5 sections, and ends on f. 16 r.; 3rd pada con-
tains 3 sections, and ends on £. 17 r.; 4th pada contains 7 sections, and ends
on f. 18 v.; 5th pada contains 3 sections, and ends on f, 19 v.; 6th pada
contains 5 sections, and ends on f. 21 v.; 7th pada contains 6 sections, and
ends on f. 23 r.; the total number of sections being 36. Chapter III has
4 padas: lst pada contains 7 sections, and ends on f. 25 v.; 2nd pada
contains 6 sections, and ends on f. 28 v.; 3rd pada contains 6 sections, f. 30
containing sections 5-6 is missing ; 4th pad« contains 6 sections, and ends
on f. 33 v.; the total number of the sections being 25. Chapter IV has
4 pddas: lst pada has 8 sections, and ends on f. 35 v.; 2nd pada has 8
sections, f. 38 containing a part of the 8th section of the 2nd p&d«, and
the 1-2 sections of the 3rd pada is missing; 3rd pZd« has 6 sections, and
ends on f. 40 v.; 4th pada has 7 sections, and ends on f. 43 v. Chapter V
has 4 padas: 1st pada contains 6 sections, and ends on f.46 r.; 2nd pada
contains 8 sections; f. 48 containing sections 6-8 is missing; 3rd pada
contains 7 sections, and ends on f. 51 r.; 4th p&dæ contains 10 sections, and
ends on f. 54 r.; the total number of sections being 31. Chapter VI has
6 padas: 1st pada contains 5 sections, ending on f. 56 r.; 2nd p£d« contains
6 sections, and ends on f. 58 r.; örd pada contains 7 sections, and ends on
f. 61 r.; 4th pada has 8 sections, and ends on f. 64 r.; 5th pada has 5
sections, and ends on f. 66 r.; 6th pada has 8 sections, and ends on £.68 v. ;
f. l is missing, The text is bounded on both sides hy double black lines.
Punctuation is similar to that of C 3. Occasionally marginal notes are
added in red ink.

Size: 87%" x34".
Material : paper.
Number of leaves ; i +64.

 


32 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Number of lines: 10.

Character: Devanagari.

Date: on f. 68 v. (= 64 v): (sic) «fa «aa ages <u #39
(i.e. completed on Wednesday in the former half of the month Vaisälkha&
A.D. 1627).

Seribe: on f. 68 v. (- 64 v.): (sic) त्र' त्र: शिवासुत् 7 र्डरसुत् ६॥
फफीपुत्र शामेञ ल्यखीतं पठनार्थं ॥

Place: on £. 68 ४. (= 64.४.) (४८०) ॥ अविमुक्तवाराणशोमध्ये ल्यषीतं वृद्धनग-
रवास्तव्यं ॥ गंगायॆ नम: ॥

Injuries: ff. 1, 80, 38, 48 are missing; f. 22 is injured, and slightly
defaced, and f. 33 is defaced by marginal notes.

Peculiarity of spelling: W is occasionally written as 1/, e.g. £. 2 r. line 2:
इतरेतरोपदेश: = इतरेतरोपादश: £92r.,line8: qutqo f. 2 v.. lino 4:
प्र परे = 4 UTL - Hf is occasionally written as 1/1 e.g. f. 2 v. line 2:
"at@tadt: = but cf. line 8, ।. 2 v., line 8: qqqt-
T is occasionally written in conjunction thus: f. 8 », line 2:

प्रतिषेघार्थोयो = line 4:

Manuscript containing the wuitardrdhau. 4. ». 1691.
Copied at Dacca.

Contents The second part (Chapters V{I-XII) of the Niérukto in the
shorter recension ; the text is divided into chapter, p&d«, and section. In
this division, and the nunber of pgdas in a chapter, and that of sections in
a pada, it agrees with M 3. The 7 padas of Chapter VII end on ff. 3 r.
(- 67 r.), 4 v. (= 68 v.), 7 v. (= 71 v.), 9r. (= 78 v.), 10 v. (- 74 v.), 18 r.
(= 77 ».), 16 v. (=80v.) respectively; the 8 pa@das of Chapter VIII
end on ff. 18 r. (- 82 r.), 21 v. (=85 v.) 24 r. (= 88 v.) respectively; the
4 padas of Chapter IX end on ff. 27 v. (= 91 v.); 30 r. (- 94 r.), 33 v.
(= 97 v.), 35 v. (= 99v.) respectively; the 4 pæ&das of Chapter X end
on ff, 89 v. (= 108 v.), 42 v, (106 v.), 46 r. (110 r.), 48 v. (- 112 v.) respec-
tively ; the 4 padas of Chapter XI end on ft. 51 v. (= 115 v.), 547', (= 118 r.),
58 v. (= 122 v.), 62 v. (126 v.) respectively ; the 4 padas of Chapter XII
end on ft. 65 v. (=129 v.), 68 r. (= 182 r.), 71 v. (= 185 v.), 75 v. (= 189 v.)
respectively. f. 56 r. (= 120 r.) is left blank. The text is bounded on
both sides by treble black lines. The accent in Vedie quotations is marked
in red ink. 'The short vertical stroke is replaced by a similar black stroke
for punctuation. - The use of the dando is similar to M 3.

The pari/sist« is separated from Chapter XII, and is contained in
f. 76-94 (= 140-158). - The division of the text into padas and Khandas

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS 33

is identical with M 8. The 4 padas of Chapter XIII end on ff. 80 v.
(= 144 v.), 89 ». (= 158 r.), 91 v. (= 155 v.), 94 r. (= 158 r.) respectively.
Pagination is continued from the end of Chapter XIL - The date given
on f. 94 r. (- 158 »): (sie) संव १७४५ वर्षे ज्येठमासे शुक्लपक्षे १५ गुरुवासरे ॥
cannot be genuine, for it is clear from the numbering of folios that it must
have been written after Chapter XII, which was finished in संवत् १७४७ ;
hence, it could not be earlier १७४७. The name of the seribe is
Harirama, a resident of Muphalipura. The colophon runs thus: (sic)

अद्येह ध्मेलकामध्ये सु॰ हरोहर
सु॰ हरीरामेन स्वयं लिषितं,

Size: 9" x 4".

Material : Paper.

Number of leaves : 94 +i blank.

Number of lines: 8.

Character : Devanägari.

Date: on f. 75 v. (-189 v.;: स्वस्ति शरी संवत् १७४७ (= $. ०. 1691)
ना वर्षे मादुवा वदि ५ बुधे.

Scribe; on f. 75 v. (= 189 v.) : दोक्षुन्सोमेश्वर: he seems to have taken
great pains in copying the manuseript, for he remarks :

(sic.) i
aga त्निखितं ग्रन्थं यत्नेन परिपालयेत् ॥

Place: on £. 75 v. (= 139 v.) (sic) | शी ढाकामध्ये ल्वषिततंमिदं ॥
Injuries: ff. 1-11 (= 65-75) are slightly defaced.

Peculiarity of spelling: it occasionally writes T as in Part I, e. g.

f. 1 v. (= 65 v.), line 1 Tad = देवतं
ï» »- » MTMWT44* -
॥ , 8 १आर्थपत्यम् = आर्थपत्यम्

Some of the figures for numbers are occasionally slightly different:
8 = s, u = यू, ७ f. 781. (= 187 r.), Rt is written as §; f. 78r.
(= 137 r.) line 8: SRHT&: - SmT&i.

MS. Chandra Shum Shere, d. 180. C5.

The text is made up of two manuscripts which are described separately.

MS. containing the purvardha, 4. D. 1758.

Contents: Chapters I-VI of the Niruwkta in the shorter recension. The
text is divided into padas and sections It agrees with C+ in having

C

 


84 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

six padas in Chapter L_ It is carelessly written, and full of mistakes. The
text is bounded by double red lines up to f. 24, and by similar black lines,
ff, 25-67. Ff. 55 v., 56 are defaced by disproportionate marginal notes.
F. 57 is wrongly numbered 56 in the original. The first four lines on
the top of f. 58 r. are to be crossed. Two geometrical figures are drawn
on f. 1 r.

Size: 84" x 41".

Material : Paper.

Number of leaves : 1+ 67.

Number of lines: 7-14.

Character : Devaniégari.

Date: on f. 67 v. (sic) संवत् १८१४ गुर्जेरे मीतो § su afe c %%
(= a. p. 1758).

Scribe: The name of the owner is added in a different handwriting
on f. 67 ४.: आ पोथि भामंगलरामसुत् नाथुराम नि & शुभं afa (i.e. this book
belongs to Nathurama, son of Bhamangabarama).

US. containing the uttdrardhu with the parisista, dated 4. ). 1479.

Contents: Chapters VII-XIII of the Nirukt« in the shorter recension,
written consecutively. 'The text is divided into pædas and Khundas,
agreeing with C4 in the number of p&das and Khanrdas, distributed in
each chapter and pada respectively. The seven padas end on ff. 2 v.
(- 69 v.), 3 v. (- 70 v., 5 v. (- 72 v., 7 r (- 7 r), 8 » (- 75 r.), 9 v.
(= 76 v.), 12 r. (= 79 r.); the three pædas of Chapter VIII on ff. 18 r.
(- 80 r.), 16 r. (- 83 r.), 17 v. (- 84 v.); the four padas of Chapter IX on
f. 20 r. (= 87 r.), 22 r. (- 89 r.), 24 v. (= 91 v.), 26 r. (= 98 r.); the four
padas of Chapter X on ff. 29 v. (= 96 v.), 81 v. (= 98 v.), 34 v. (= 101 v.),
36 v. (= 108 v.); the four padas of Chapter XI on ff. 39 r. (- 106 r.), 41 r.

- 108 r.), 48 v. (= 110 v.), 46 v. (= 118 v.); the four padas of Chapter XII
on ff. 49 r. (- 116 r.), 51 r. (- 118 r.), 54 r. (- 121 r.), 56 v. (- 123 v.); the
four padas of Chapter XIII on ff. 60 r. (= 127 r.), 67 r. (= 134 r), 69 v.

= 186 v.), 71 v. (= 188 v.). The text is bounded on both sides by double
black lines. The accent in Vedie stanzas is marked in red ink. Punctua-
tion is similar to M 3. It is a very good manuseript, neat and accurate.

Size: 84" x 8%".

Material : Paper.

Number of leaves: 72 4i blank.

Number of lines: 9.

Charaeter: Devanägari.

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS 35

Date: on f. 71 v. (- 138 v.): I स्वस्ति संवत् १५३५ (= ^. 0. 1479) वषे भादुवा
११ ऽद्येह.

Scribe: on f. 71 v. (- 138 ४.): पीतांबरेण निरुक्तं संपूर्णे लिखितमस्ति ॥ शुभं ॥
The Colophon runs thus : (sic) शो अलिप्राकारॆ महाराजाघिराय शरो भाणविज-

यराज्ये आभ्यंतरनागरज्ञातीय महायाज्ञक शो ञो शंकरसुत याज्ञक शो
प्रयागदाससुत: या॰ लङ्न आमध्ययनार्थ षोतांबरेण &c. The name of the owner
is given on £72 r. (= 139 1): @ifwWa शी प्रयागदाससुतज्ञ याञ्जिक HI wy

आनि I Rites and sacrifices performed by the owner at various places
of pilgrimages like Kuruksetra, Benares, &c., are enumerated on f. 72 r.

(- 1389 r..
Peculiarity of spelling: H is always written as @, W is written as / ,
.g. 44 = ITY on f. 71 v., line 6.
f. 54 r. (= 121 r.), line 8: देवगणा: =
» ,, ., 4: तेषां - T4Wf and so on.
T is written as 1/U, e. g.
f. 58 v. (- 120 v.), line 9; «aga@ta4 = #atgiata
EI » » *: पितैषां - fütqui and so on.
Kt is written as 1/1, e. g.
f. 53 v.(- 120 v.), line 1: पवित्रवंतो = पवित्रवोता
» » " *; पुराणो = पुराणा
» m » 6; शुणोत्वजा॰ = शराणात्वजा॰.
ऒ is written as |/ t, e. g.
f. 5 r. (= 72 r.), line 6; वित्यौपमिक्म् = 1वात्योपमिकम्
8. in conjunction with T is written as a short vertical stroke, and with
H or d as a horizontal stroke, c. g.

प्रित्य = प्रिय: इत्यपि = इयपि
उत्साह - "TS: 4 - 4 and so on.
< is written variously as «w or æ or æ.
Injuries: ff. 9 (= 76), 10 (= 77), 19 (= 86), 29 (= 96) are slightly
injured.

MS. Chandra Shum Shere, e. 61. C 6.

Contents: The Nirukta of Yaska in the longer recension. It consists
of three manuscripts; the first contains Chapters I-V in 86 leaves (86 v.
. gives a part of the first section of Chapter VI); the second, Chapter VI in
ए ३

 


36 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

27 leaves (numbered in the original as 47-783 = 87-1183); the third,
Chapters VII-XIV, in 78 leaves (= 114-191). The division of the text
into Chapters and sections (Khandas), the punctuation, and the
method of marking the accent in Vedic stanzas are identical with M 4.
The text is bounded by double red lines only occasionally. F. 3 is replaced
by a leaf in a later handwriting. Ff. 87-92 are written on blue paper.
A summary similar to M 4 is added at the end of each chapter.

Size: 82" x 4" (ff. 1-86) and 73" x 34 (f. 87-118), 734" x 3%" (ff. 114-191).

Material: Paper.

Character : Devanagari.

Number of leaves: i+ 191 +i blank.

Number of lines: 7 (&. 1-113), 7-10 (f. 114-191).

Date and Scribe: Not known.

The name of the owner is added on f. 114 r.: | T& Ya वटङ्मुक्षवीरेश्वर-
भट्टस्येदं पुस्तकं योगीश्वर्ये नम: ॥

MS. Chandra Shum Shere, d. 183. C7.

Contents: The uttarardha of the Niruktu, Chapters VII-XI, and
sections 1-27 of Chapter XII in the shorter recension. The text is
bounded by treble black lines on both sides, and is divided into padas
and KLandas. The numbering of sections does not begin anew in each
pada, but is consecutive for the whole chapter, and agrees with the
manuscripts of the longer recension. It looks old; the ink is totally
effaced in several parts, which makes it difficult to read; but it is not
really old, for it does not display any characteristics of old writing. It
is full of mistakes. Three lines are added at the bottom on f. 13 v., 52 v.
Marginal notes are occasionally written.

Size: 92" x 3%".

Material; Paper.

Number of leaves: i--584i blank.

Number of lines per folio: 7.

Character: Devan&gari.

Date and Scribe: Not known, for the last leaves are missing.

Peculiarity of spelling: W, is occasionally written as a short horizontal
stroke in conjunction. F. 1 v., line 1; ॰स्तुतींगां ram ॰स्रुतींनरं, f. 1 v., line 2:

«fda - gfd. @ is doubled in conjunction with T, e. g. कर्म = कर्म्म . *. 58 ४.
is torn in two.

 


DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF MANUSCRIPTS 87
MS. Wilson 488. W 1.

Yaska's Niruktu, A.D. 1768.

This is described in detail by Keith in the Catalogue of Sanskrit
Manuseripts, vol. ii, }). 107. His description may be supplemented by the
following: the Colophon on f. 79 v. runs thus : (sic) I Ht I

मंगलं लेखकानां च पाठकानां च मंगलं ।
मंगलं सर्वजंतुनां मंगलं सर्वमंगल ॥

यादृशं पुस्तकं दृष्टा तादृशं लिखितं मया

यदि शुद्धमशुद्धं वा मम दोषो न दोयतां ॥२॥

Two more verses are added in a different hand, one being a slight
modification of a verse from the Pusicatantra. The purvardha and the

uttarardha are written in different hands.
Peculiarity of spelling: < and @_are occasionally doubled in conjunction

£.1 v., line 7: agia@t =
22%, ., द्बिमूर्त =यू'र्तं
Number of lines per folio: 7 (ft. 1-21), 9 (ff. 22-79), 7 (fF. 80-162),
8 (F. 163-183).
Injuries: Ff. 58-63 are slightly injured by worns on the left
marginal top.

with T, e.g.

MS. Wilson 491. W 2.

This manuscript is described in detail by Keith in the Catalogue of
Sanskrit Manuscripts in the Bodleian Library, vol. ii, p. 106. His descrip-
tion may be supplemented as follows :

Peculiarity of spelling: It writes YT as tH

ए is occasionally written as |/, e. g. TYa = वचात
ऐ ,, » » = ।/ ए, ॥ तचैतं = तात्रेतं
ओ ,, 3 » - » /b » मंत्रो - HTHT
k um 3; » - » V/WI -/ = «ita thia

Number of lines per folio: 8 (f£ 1-61), 9 (ff. 62-78), 8 (ff. 79-91), 9
(fi. 92-101), it varies from 10-11 (ff. 102-130).

F. 104 is upside down. The size of leaves (ff. 79-86) is: 83^x 85".
Ff. 79-130 are written in a handwriting different from that of the previous
folios.

$ ’.‘/टूङ्गु/ट्टुहू ॰
तिस्र A 727.;;

Nas

\&
» "A

I

 


88 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

MS. WiZson 474. W 8.

This is described in detail by Keith in the of Sanskrit
Manuscripts in the Bodleian Library, vol. ii, p. 107. His description may
be supplemented by the following :

Poculiarity of spelling: W is occasionally written as /, e.g. f. 2 r.
line 2: $$t - $IW; «wa - uqa - ugqI«; f.? ro line 3; इंद्रेण॰० =
suæ u; -

ऐ is written as 1/V, e.g. tga = ETZTRq.
«p , 0 50 » 1/b » इंद्रो = द्याद्रा} तृत्सवो = तृत्सावा.

But its chief peculiarity is that it frequently doubles consonants in
conjunction, e.g. f. 2 r., line 2: yfam1t, 4 is doubled, ¥E@A, is doubled ;
तृत्तसावा, त् 15 doubled line 4: विच्ञ्जुन, 3 is doubled; line 5: वीय्याणि, य
is doubled; प्पवोचम्, Y is doubled ; line 6: < "for yerso; line 7 : 44, a

is doubled; f. 2 v., line 2: चिद्च्चन्नूट्टुशसत 10 चिदन्यद्दिशंसत, f. 3 r., line 1:
@. is doubled ; line 6: बहुलम्, E is doubled , mäta, ज्ञ is doubled ;
f. 4 r., line 1: TMtat@amy=ftuataziafa for

and so on.

MS. Mull 144. Mi.
Copied at Ahmedabad, a.». 1730.

This is described in detail by Keith in the Catalogue of Sanskrit
Manuscripts in the Bodleian Library, vol. ii, p. 106. It occasionally

doubles @ in conjunction with other consonants, ९. ४. |. 2 r., line 8: wfawu-
&c.

The numbering of sections does not begin anew in each pada, but is
continuous, and agrees with the longer recension as to the total number of
sections in Chapters IX-XII. It belongs to the shorter recension.

MS. Sanskrit, e. 17. S.
4. D. 1781.

This is described in detail by Keith in the Catalogue of Sanskrit
Manuscripts in the Bodleian Inbrary, vol. ii, p. 105. The text is punctuated
as usual, and divided into chapters and sections. A summary similar to
the one described on p. 1 is added at the end of each chapter. It belongs
to the longer recension. The text is bounded on both sides by two sets of
double red lines. It is a neat and accurate manuscript.

 


THE TEXT OF THE NIRUKTA 39

The Relationship of the MSS.: two recensions.

The manuscripts fall into two groups, and for the sake of convenience
and brevity, may be called A and B-A representing the longer and B the
shorter recension. None of the manuseripts grouped in these two families is
earlier than A.D. 1479. Although they have been copied from earlier manu-
seripts-often with great labour and trouble as some of the seribes remark-
neither of them transmits the text of the Nirw/t« in an uninterpolated state.
Both recensions add the parisigta-which ean be proved to be an interpola-
tion by independent testimony-as an integral part of the text, and cannot,
therefore, be the faithful representatives of the archetype. Moreover, both
have besides the parisista, an entire section or the equivalent of a section
added on to them. - These additions are meaningless. The commentary on
the Vedic stanzas quoted therein is very poor, and written in a style quite
different from that of Yaska. For instance, there can hardly be any doubt
as to the interpolated character of ix. 2, which is given as a constituent part
of the text by the manuscripts of both recensions. Further, the commentary
on the Vedic stanza in xi. 7 is meaningless and written in a different
style. The Vedic stanza, being quite easy, requires no explanation. Yaska
generally does not comment on easy Vedic stanzas, simply remarking:
iti sa nigada-vyakhyata', i.c. 'this stanza is explained by the mere reading'.
In all such cases, this note of Yaska comes after casy Vedie stanzas only.
It would thus be intelligible, if it had followed immediately the Vedic
stanzas in xi. 7. - But as the text now stands, it is placed just after a very
difficult Vedic stanza in xi. 8. This is contrary to Yaska's method. It is
clear that the words: 7८८ ऽत nigado-vy@khyata were originally placed
immediately after the Vedie stanzas in xi.7. The intervening passage is
an interpolation, and rather a clumsy one, for it can be easily detected.
This is further proved by the fact that Durga, who repeats every word of
Yaska in his commentary, ignores them. How these additions gradually
find their way into the text is illustrated by the following example. There
is an easy quotation in xii. 2, and Yaska, as usual, simply adds: iti s&
niquda-vyakhyata. - Some interpolators have endeavoured to add after
these words a short comment. Thus some manuscripts here subjoin the

following remark: a@tfay स्म चरथो वसातयो रातयो वसन्ते . . . . . सुरातयो: ॥
Further, each recension contains passages, which, being superfluous, are
omitted by the other, or are amplified versions of those in the other. For
example, B adds, between vii. 19 and 20, one entire section, which is omitted
by A. It is clearly an interpolation as the commentary on the Vedic
stanzas is identical with that of xiv. 33 with slight alterations.
: Cf. N. x. 18, 21; xi. 3, 45; xii. 31,

 


40 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Again, in B the commentary on the Vedic stanza quoted in v. 27, reads
88 10]1058;: सुदेवस्त्वं कल्याणदानो यस्य तव देव सप्त सिंघव: प्राणायानुक्षरन्ति काकुदं
सूर्म्य मुषिरामिवेत्यपि निगमो भवति ॥ २७॥

A's version of this is greatly amplified :

मुढेवस्त्वं कल्याणदेव: कमनीयदेवो at मवसि वरुण यस्य ते सप्त सिंधव: सिन्ध

स्रवणाद्यस्य ते सप्त स्रोतांसि तानि ते काकुदभनुक्तरन्ति । सूर्मि:; कल्याणोर्भि: स्रोत:
सुषिरमनु यथा । बीरिटं पूर्वं
स्मिन्भांसि वा । तदेतस्यास्रृच्युदाहरन्त्यपि निगमो भवति ॥ २७ ॥

Further, & contains a long passage in 6.5: ver ऋषीन्पप्रच्छ . . . . व्याख्याता:
omitted by B.

d. *Omissio ex homoeoteleuto? in Sanskrit Manuscripts.

Tt is clear, therefore, that both the recensions cannot faithfully represent
the archetype. Hence the question arises which of them adheres more
closely to the original? Roth adopted the text as given by the longer
recension in his edition, without, however, assigning adequate reasons for
his preference. The same text is also adopted by most of the editors of
the Nirwkta. This text, as has been shown above, does not represent the
original. It is true that often the longer recension preserves the better
text, for sometimes passages are omitted by accident. The eye of the
seribe wanders from a particular word to the same or to a similar word,
occurring further on in the text, with the result that the intervening
words are omitted. - This phenomenon known as ex komoeoteleuto
is universal and of very frequent occurrence, The following example
illustrates this kind of omission. In copying the lines: ''The book, which
is rather scarce, was till very lately of absolute necessity for the Student of
the Christian hymnology, above all for the Student of Adam of St. Victor's
hymns ', the eye of the copyist wandered from the student of the first to
the same word in the second line and the words 'of the Christian . . . . for
the' were left out. 'The same thing happened to the scribe of MS. C 3.

In copying the sentence: तत्सृरग्णां सुरत्वम् । असोरसुरान-

सृजत तदमुराणामसुरत्वमितति विज्ञायते ॥15 eye wandered from the word असृजत
in the first line to the same word in the second line, with the result that

the words «ect qvæ i THTTYTTA were loft out.

Again, in copying N. vi. 22: @t Tra: wary gage fafafeg | RV,
४11. 4.19. &c: aaifaaatit a@trtafa | the eye of the scribe wandered
from the स्थूरं of the first line to the similar word gC in the second line:

1 Clark, Descent of Manuserip!(s, p. 1.

 


THE TEXT OF THE NIRUKTA 41

consequently the intervening words TTY; . . . . दिविष्टिषु ०५८
omitted in MS. C 3.

Further in . 11. 26: देवोऽनयत्सविता सुपाणि: कल्याणपाणि: । पाणि': पणायते:
पूजाकर्मण: प्रगृह्य पाणी देवान्पूजयन्ति । तस्य वयं प्रसवे याम उर्वो: । देवोऽनयत्सविता
सुपाणि: 13 ७1९ #एऽ९ [ठठ ०! [1३ second hemistich of the stanza of RV. IIL
38.6. remembered the second pade «& वयं प्रसवे
याम उर्वो: and wrote it down immediately after finishing the first pada
with the result that the intervening words | ufu: ud@tad ....

Ystafa are missing in MS. C 4. It cannot therefore be concluded that the
shorter recension is always the best, for sometimes omissions are accidental.

e. Dittography in Sanskrit Manuscripts.

On the other hand, there is also the phenomenon called dittography,
i.e. the repetition or addition of a few words or sentences. An excellent
example of dittography is furnished by The Globe on July 9, 1915.

'The Echo de Puris publishes a message from Cettinje announcing the
message from Cettinje announcing the appointment as Governor of Seutari
of Bojo Petrovitch.' * 'The part of the second line is a verbatim repetition
of a part of the first line.

In N. ii 298, ya स्य वाजी क्षिपणिं तुरण्यति स्रोवायां वद्वो अपि , . . . क्रतुं

उतभि ति । । । - : + -

अपिकक्ष आसनीति व्याख्यातम् । क्रतुं वाजी क्षिपणिं तुरण्यति ग्रीवायां बडो
दधिक्रा: . . . . the eye of the scribe wandered by chance after mg to the
Vedic stanza, and he mechanically copies the whole of the first line except
उत & in MS. C उ.

Again, in N. vi. 8, the seribe of the MS. Mi, repeats गृह्णग्ङ्गुतकर्मग् चा.

Further there are some passages whose omission by B is absolutely
unjustifiable. Yaska explains every word occurring in the fourth chapter
of the Nighantu. 'The omission of the passages containing the explaua-
tion of any of these words is therefore inconsistent with Yaska's plan.
Examples of such omissions are the following. Yaska explains fT:
(Ngh. 4. 8. 12) in N. vi. 8, but the passage: f&"j8T fasrurETf&T: is omitted
by B. Again, Yaska explains (Xgh. 4. 3. 28) in N. vi. 6 as
TIT, which is omitted by B. This omission makes the following Vedic
quotation meaningless.

Further, in commenting upon a Vedic stanza, Yaska always starts from
the very beginning of the stanza. To leave out the first few words and.to

1 Clark, op. cit., p. 6.

 


42 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

begin from somewhere in the middle of the stanza is altogether foreign to
his practice, yet if the text of B be followed, the omission of the passage:

यवमिव gautfgat faawt (N. vi. 26) would involve Yaska in an incon-
sistency. All this shows that B is not absolutely reliable.

Now let us examine A. The majority of the manuscripts of A belong
to a period later than those of B. Thus, not one of them has preserved
the old spelling, while most of the B MSS. retain this peculiarity, i.e.

of writing u as i/ as qt 4 for gg

» 1 . /t . tw , Sw
» Ht » l/ _- , त्रयो
» u for $ . Tat, "Et

Again, some of the A MSS. divide the purisista into the so-called
thirteenth and the fourteenth chapters, while those of B put the whole of
the purisista into one chapter only, which is numbered the thirteenth.

It has already been pointed out that A contains an obvious interpolation
in N. vi. 5, and an amplified version of B's comment in N. v. 27. Besides
these there are shorter passages seattered throughout the book which are
omitted by B and are suspected to be interpolations. One very fertile and
insidious source of interpolations is supplied by Yaska's own method of giving
etymological explanations. He does not content himself with one deriva-
tion, but goes on adding derivation after derivation of a single word till
the whole list of probable, possible, and even fanciful etymologies is
exhausted. In many cases, interpolators found it quite easy to add new
derivations and attribute them to Väska. A contains a considerable

number of such additions, while B has only two.

The following are a few samples:

N. ii, 6. A reads: वृक्षो व्रश्चनात् । वृत्वा क्षां तिष्ठतीति वा । क्षा क्षियतेर्निवा-
सकर्मण: । नियतामीमयत् . . . .

B reads: वृक्षो व्रश्चनात् । नियतामीमयत् . . . .
The two derivations are omitted.

N. ii. 10. A reads: हिरण्यं कस्मात् . . . . हितरमणं भवतोति वा हृदयरमणं
भवतोति वा ।
B reads: हिरण्यं कस्मात् . . . . . हितरमणं भवतीति वा ।
N. ii. 13. A reads: गूयेंग्'रा'द्गितैयम'दितै पुत्रमेवम् ।
B ४९05: सूर्यमादितेयमेवम् ।
N. ii. ९0. ॥ ९05; आमिनाने आमिन्वाने अन्योन्यस्याध्यात्मं कुवाणे ।
B "९805: आमिनाने अन्योन्यस्याध्यात्मं कुवाणे ।

 


THE TEXT OF THE NIRUKTA 43

N.ii 22. A reads: प्रथम इति समुख्यनाम प्रतमो भवति । छन्तत्रमन्तरिक्षम ।
विकर्तनं मेघानां विकर्तनेन मेघानामुदकं जायते ।
B reads: प्रथम इति मुख्यनाम प्रतमो भवति । विकर्तनेन मेघानामुदकं जायते ।
N. iii. 8. & ७७१5; अग्रगामिन्यो भवन्तोति वाग्रगालिन्यो भवन्तोति वाग्रका-
रिण्यो भवन्तीति वाग्रसारिण्यो भवन्तीति वाङ्कना भवन्ति . . , .
B ९१5: अग्रगामिन्यो भवन्तीति वाग्रगालिन्यो भवन्तोति वाग्रकारिण्यो
भवन्तीति वाङ्कना भवन्ति . . . .
ॐ. 15.10. & "९05: । खण्डं तडङिदित्यन्तिकवधघयो: . . . .
B reads: । तङिदित्यन्तिकवधयो: . , . .
N. iii. 15. A reads: को वां शयने विधवेव देवरम् । देवरं कस्माद द्वितीयो
वर उच्यते। विधवा विघातृका भवति ।

B reads: को वां शयने विधवेव देवरम् । विधवा विघातुका भवति। 1
this particular case it is obvious that the passage देवरे कस्मात्, &८., is an
interpolation, for as the words stand in the first line, Yaska would naturally
give the etymological explanation of विधवा first and then of ZT. not
vice versa. As a matter of fact he does so; after explaining he says :

Z4 @taifamat. This would have been absurd if the reading of A
represents the original.
N. iiis 16. A reads; 8T&erWTT va वृषला इवेति । वृषलो वृषशीलो भवति वृषा-
ist at i a§ 1
B reads: gtguUt <a वृषला इवेति ॥ १६॥
>. क. 19. A reads: fattatafea .... Se । निर्णीतं कस्मात् । निर्णिक्तं
भवति ।
B ९७१5; निर्णीतान्तर्हित . . . . षट ।
N.iv.2. A reads: quræt . . . . स्वात् । मयादा मर्यैरादीयते । मयोदा
मयीदिनो विभाग: ।
B reads: मर्यग्दा . . . : स्यात्। मयौदग् मयौद्दिनो' faint: i
N. iv. 10. A 6005: लजक्ष्मी लोभाद्वा लक्षणाद्वा ल्प्स्यनाद्दा लाञ्छनाद्वा . . .
B "९७05: लक्ष्मी लाभाद्दा लक्षणाद्वा लाञ्छनाद्वा , . ,
N. iv. 18. A reads: समीरितान्ता: सुसमीरितान्ता: पृथ्वन्ता वा ।
B reads : समीरितान्ता: पृथ्वन्ता वा ।
N. iv. 15. A "९808; कन्या कमनीया भवति । क्वेयं नेतव्येति वा । कमनेनानोयत

इति at | mada वा ।
8 1९४०: कन्या कमनीया भवति । क्वेयं नेतव्येति वा । कनतेवी ।

 


44 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

N. iv. 19. - A reads: उदकं हर उच्यते । at gcig =a 1 acat
उच्यते ।
B reads: उदकं हर उच्यते । लोका हरांस्युच्यन्ते ।
\. ४.३. ॐ "९05: पानैरिति वा स्पाशनैरिति वा स्पर्शनेरिति वा ।
5 "९७0ऽ: पानिरिति वा स्पाशनेरिति वा ।
ॐ, ४. 1९. A ९०05: तुप्रप्रहारी क्षिप्रप्रहारी खप्नप्रहारी ।
B reads : तृप्नप्नग्म्यारीं ।
'. ४. १6. A reads: जिह्वा कोकुवा । कोकूयमाना वणीन्नुदतीति वा । कोकूयतॆ
वा स्याच्छज्दकर्मण: ।
B reads: जिह्वा कोकुवा । कोकूयमाना वणौत्तुदतीति वा ।
N. vi. 8. A reads: जिगर्ति firrfam«T वा गुणातिकमो वा वा ।
B reads: जिगर्तिं गिरतिकर्मा वा गृह्णातिकर्मा वा
N. vi. 16. A reads: अभवत सर्वेऽग्यगमनेनेति वाग्रगरणेनेति वाग्रसंपादिन
इति वा ।

B reads: अभवत सर्वेऽग्रगमनेनेति वाग्रसंपादिन इति वा ।
N. vi. 38. A reads: stad fog । विठमन्तरिक्षस् । विटं व्याख्यातम् ।
B ॥९805: शीर्यते । विठं बीरिटेन व्याख्यातम् ।
N. vi. 32. A reads: बुन्ढ इषुर्मवति बिम्दो वा मभिन्दो वा भयदो वा .
B reads : इंषुर्मव'ति र्तिधून्दन्' चा Hag? वा .
N. vi. 83. A ९8१5: ऋदूपे अर्दनपातिनौ गमनपांतिंनौ _शब्दपातिनौ दूर्पा-
fast वा मर्सण्यर्दनवेधिनौ गमनवबेधिदॊ शब्दवेधिनो दूर्वेधिनो वा ।

ॐ ऋदूपे अदनपातिनौ गमनपातिनौ वा सर्मण्यर्दनवेधिनौ गमनवे-
घिनौ वा ।

Instances might be multiplied, but the above examples suffice to show
that A has been much more tampered with than B.

Fortunately, as has been said above, Durga repeats every word of the
Niruktla in his commentary, so that the text of the Niruktg 'in toto can be
reproduced from his commentary alone. - This commentary therefore serves
the purpose of a manuscript of the Nirukta and supplies valuable information
ahout the condition of the text in its author's time. Durga does not
recognize the parisiste as an integral part of the Niruktu, as in fact he is
even unaware of its existence. Thus his commentary preserves the text
of the Nirukte as current before the addition of the parisistæ. Further,
it derives great value from the fact that Durga dlsphys critical judgement
in the adoptlon of readings in the text, while giving variants and adding
critical notes on them. For example, in N. i. 2, ho "0४05 अयुगपत् but

 


THE TEXT OF 'THE NIRUKTA 45

gives YTuq@ as a variant, adding:
urat aitueti uTq«: i

Again, in N. i. 12, he reads संविज्ञातानि but gives dfawiaitfa as
३ भस, इका अथवा संविज्ञानानि तानि संविज्ञातानि तानि चेत्युभावप्येतौ
पाठो ।

Again, in . गरा. 15, ॥०'लागरकारऽ: आग्नि न यच इत्यस्य ळ्ळिनघएट्टुनूत्रस्प दुंसँदाप्तो
न सुरायामित्यनेनैव यतार्थतेति मन्यमाना: केचिदत्र नियसं नाधीयते । अपरे पुन:
समाम्नायानुक्रसो ऽ यमिति मन्यमाना एवमेवं निगममधोयते ।

Again, in . क्रां, २], 0005 अविनाशि ।।। ४1४९ऽ अविनाशं ४&ऽ & ४४४8,
adding: zwr; त्वधीयते अविनाश नामेति । तेषामविनाशस्यैव नाम ।

Again, in , 1४. 19, ॥९ ९805 स्यु: ४४९3 असन् 85 0 ४घ्णांचा।, तपते] ;
भाष्येऽपि स्युरित्येष: uts: | (sic) असनित्येष: प्रमाद्पाठ: ।

Again, in N. vi. 2, he remarks: निरजे गा इत्यत्र केचित्पशुगव्यं एता इति
व्याचक्षतॆ ।

Again, in N. vi. 4, he reads अवनायान्नम् एए gives Kaf@atga4 and
SHWWTI4H as variants.

Again, in N. vi. 6, he reads क्षयणस्य but gives TUE as a variant,
adding: sitrrærarqiæ zer&4 | | क्षयणस्येति हि भाष्यकारो निराह।

Again, on N. vi. 21, he remarks: ऋज्ञति: | इत्यनेन
यतार्थतामस्य मन्यमानो भाष्यकारो निगमं नाधीते । केचित्त्वत्रैतं शेषमघीयते । दूतं वो
विश्ववेदसं . . . . 8.5.8.1.

Again, on N. vi. 33, he remarks: भाष्यमत्र न सम्यग्रिव लस्यते । तस्य सम्यक
पाठोऽन्वेष्य: । ततो योज्यम् ।

This shows that Durga took pains to ascertain the correct readings and
has handed down a sort of critical edition of the Nirukta, as it existed in
his time.

f. 1. Three stages of interpolations.

We have thus manuscript materials which belong to three distinet periods.

(1) D, i.e. the commentary of Durga, written before the edition of
the parisistas and embodying the whole text of the Nirukta, represents
the earliest period, i.e. about the thirteenth century A. D.

(?) B, ie. the manuscripts of the shorter recension represent a
period later than D,.-when the parisgistes were added, but not divided
as yet into different chapters, and when the old orthography was still
prevalent.

 


46 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

(3) A, i. c. the manuseript of the longer recension, represents a still
later period when the parisistas had been divided into chapters and the
old orthography had gone out of use.

A collation of these three different recensions indicates that three
distinet stages of interpolations in the Niruwki@ can be clearly traced. For
example, let us take a passage in N.i. 4, On collating D, B, and A, we
find that the reading of D has been expanded in B, and that of B in A.

४.1. 4. क "७६१5: आचार्यश्चिदिदं ब्रूयादिति पूजायाम् । दधिचिदित्युपमार्थे |
कुल्माषांच्चिदाहरेत्यवकुत्सिते । नु इत्येषो . . . .

3 १९१5: आचार्यञ्चिदिदं ब्रयादिति पूजायाम्। आचार्य आचारं ग्राहयत्या-
चिनोत्यथानाचिनोति बुद्धिमिति वा। दधिचिदित्युपमार्थे । कुल्माषांचिदाहरेत्यवकुत्सिते।
कुल्माषा: कुलेषु सीदन्ति । नु इत्येषो . . . .

A "९४05: आचार्यञ्चिदिदं ब्रूयादिति पूजायाम् । आचार्य कस्मात्। आचार्य
आचारं ग्राहयत्याचिनोत्यथानाचिनोति वा । ददधिचिदित्युपमार्थे । कुल्माषां-
श्चिदाहरेत्यवकुत्सिते । कुल्माषा: कुलेषु सीदन्ति । नु इत्येषो . . . .

Another example for these three stages is suppled by N. ix. 2, as
follows :
D reads:
अश्वो व्याख्यात: । तस्यैषा भवति ॥ १॥
मा नो मित्रो वरुणो अर्यमायुरिन्द्र . . . .
B reads :
अश्वो व्याख्यात: । तस्यैषा भवति ॥१॥

अश्वो सुखं . . . . . . इन्द्रायेन्दो परि स्रव ॥
अश्वो वोळ्हा सुखं वोज्ला । सुखमिति कल्याणनास । कल्याणं पुण्यं सुहितं भवति ।
मानो व्याख्यात: । तस्यैषा भवति ॥ २॥
मा नो मित्रो वरुणो अर्यमायुरिन्द्र . . . .
A reads :
अश्वो व्याख्यात: । तस्यैषा भवति ॥ १॥
अश्वो वोळ्हा सुखं . . . . - इन्द्रायेन्दो परि स्रव ॥

TAI dist ge ist TH dist | सुखमिति कल्याणनाम । कल्याणं पुण्यं
सुहितं भवति । सुहितं गम्यतीति at | gaat वा पाता वा पालयिता वा । शेषमृच्छ-
तो ति । वारि वारयति । मानो व्याख्यात: । तस्यैषा भवति ॥२॥

at नो मित्रो वरुण अर्यमायुरिन्ध . . . .

 


THREE STAGES OF INTERPOLATIONS 47

It has been shown above that the list of etymologies increases as one
passes from the text of B to that of A. In the same manner the list
of etymologies increases in B as compared with D. The following are
some examples.

N.i. 4. D reads: | नु इत्येषो: . . . .

B reads: | g=TuT: georg «laf=a ! q <a-
षो . . . .
1) ४९१5: वया: शाखा वेते: । शाखा: खशया: ।
B 7९५5: वया: शाखा वेते वातायना भवन्ति । शाखा: खशया: शक्नोते वा ।

~. 1.7. D reads: बृहद्वदेम स्वे ॰वेंट्नै । नृहारूंट्'प्ति महतो नामधेयम् ।
B reads: बृहद्वदेम स्वे वेदने। भगो भजते: । बृहदिति महतोनामधेयम् ।
N. ii. 22. D reads: वुचूकभित्युढ्वजग्म . . . शब्दकर्मणो भ्रंशते वा ॥२२॥
}} ४९४१: वृबूर्कमित्युद्कनाम . . . . शब्दकर्मणो भ्रंशते वा । पुरीषं पृणाते;
पूरयतॆ वा ॥२२॥
N. ii 26. D reads:
तस्य वयं प्रसवे याम उर्वो: ।
प्रत्याख्यायान्तत आशुश्रव: ॥ २६॥
B reads : तस्य वयं प्रसवे याम उर्वो: ।
उर्व्य ऊर्णोते र्वृणोतेरित्योर्णवाम: ।
प्रत्याख्यायान्तत आशुश्चुव: ॥ २६॥

N. iii 18. D reads: fae: सहनात् । सपूर्वस्य वा हन्ते: संहाय हन्तोति वा ।
B reads: सिंह: सहनात् । हिंसे वा स्याद् विपरीतस्य: । संपूर्वस्य वा हन्ते:
संहाय हन्तोति वा ।

N. v. 4. D reads: WHI अङ्गुलयो भवन्ति । शया इषव: शरमय्य: ।
। ९05; शयो अङ्गुलयो भवन्ति । कमाणि । शया इषव: शरमय्य: ।
N.v. 23. D reads:
उरुष्याणो अघायत: समस्मात् ।
इति पंचम्याम् ॥२३॥
B reads : उरुष्याणो अधायत: समस्मात् ।
इति पंचम्याम् । उरुष्यतिरकर्मक: ।
अथापि प्रथमावज्ञवचने ।
नभन्तामन्यके समे ॥ २३ ॥

 


48 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

MS. C 1 agrees with B except that the last line qu is
omitted.

N. vi. 83. D reads:
उद्धर रक्ष: सहसूलमिन्द्र ।
वृञ्चमध्यम् । प्रतिशृणोह्यग्रम् । »
B reads: उद्धर रक्ष: सहमूलमिन्द्र ।
मूलं मोचनाद्वा मोषणाद्वा मोहनाद्वा ।
वृश्चमध्यम् । प्रतिशृणोह्यग्रम् ।
N. vi. 8. 1) 7९08: देवो दॆवान्प्रत्यक्तया कृपा कल्पितया ॥८॥
B ९०05; दिवो देवान्प्रत्यक्तया कृपा । कृपा कृमुतेवा कल्पतेवा ॥८॥
N. vi. 24. D reads;: गल्दा धमनयो भवन्ति ।

A 0805: गल्दा घमनयो भवन्ति । गलनमासु धोयते ।
B omits it altogether.

N. vi. 28. 1) "०505: अन्या किल . . . . कच्यैव युक्तं लिबुजेव वृक्षम्।

B 7९08; अन्धा किल . . . . कच्येव युक्तं लिबुजेव वृक्षम् । लिबुजा व्रततिर्भवति
लोयते विभजन्तीति । व्रततिर्वैरणाञ्च सयनाञ्च ततनाञ्च ।

॥. २.  एकाक्षाश 158:95086 of Servius, commentator of Virgil

Thus the stages of interpolation at different periods can be traced.
The principle of the 'best MSS! is obviously inapplicable in this case,
for none of the manuscripts can be called the best. All that is available
is the best manuscript of each family, and the best plan, under the cireum-
stances, would be to place all the three families side by side, Fortunately
it is possible to do so, for the successive interpolations from one family to
another are invariably the amplifications of the text of a shorter recension,
and are thrust between sentences wherever the text could be so enlarged
with impunity, as, for instance, in multiplying the number of etymologies
and attributing them all to Vaska. I have, however, distinguished the
evidence of Durgvs commentary from that of the manuscripts of the
Niruktu, although Durga's commentary is very important for supplying
such valuable evidence for the history of the text of the Niriwkia, it cannot,
strictly speaking, be called a manuscript of the Nirukta. The relation of
the shorter to the longer recension is shown by the use of square brackets,
which contain the additional passages of the longer recension, while the
relation of the shorter recension to the text preserved by Durga is indicated
by foot-notes. An analogous example is furnished by Latin literature. The
text of Servius, commentator of Virgil, shows a similar threefold amplifica-

 


THREE STAGES OF INTERPOLATIONS 49

tion, the three stages of interpolation being pointed out by Thilo in his
edition. I think the text of the Nirukta reproduced from Durga represents
the archetype as closely as it is possible to restore it with the help of the
present materials. I have collated" sixteen manuscripts myself, besides
taking into account fourteen manuscripts collated by Roth, and cight by
the editor of the Nirukta in Bib. Ind. Thus, directly and indirectly, the
evidence of about forty manuscripts has been available for this edition, and
the text may therefore be regarded as more or less settled.

q. Commentators of Yaska.

Although, from an early period, Yaska's work has been recognized as
one of the most important ved&ngas by the orthodox tradition of literary
India, he, unlike Panini, has not had many commentators. This does not
mean that he had few followers or that his speculations did not dominate
the thought of succeeding generations. On the contrary, he has been
acknowledged to be the pre-eminent authority on etymology. Hence (at
first sight) it seems rather inexplicable that his work should have been com-
mented upon by so few people. One reason of this paucity is that Yaska's
work itself is a commentary and not an independent treatise, hence it did
not stand in need of much elucidation. Secondly, it is written in classical
Sanskrit prose, and, notwithstanding its somewhat archaic and terse style,
is easily intelligible to the reader as compared, for instance, with the
aphorisms of Panini; consequently there was not much demand for further
comment. - Yet three commentators, at least, are known to have elucidated
Yaska's work.

(1) Ugra is mentioned as a commentator on the Nirukt« by Aufrecht
in his Cutalogus Cutalogorum'® But no other information, about his
personality, the character of his work, and the time when he lived, is
available. No reference is made to him by any of the other writers in
the same field.

(?) The second commentator is Skandasvami, mentioned by Deva-
rAjayajvansö A manuscript of his work exists in the Bibliotheque
Nationale, Paris,* and a friend of mine from Lahore has recently informed
me that he has obtained a complete manuscript of his commentary.

' Since then, on my visit to Paris, I have
been able, through the courtesy of Professor
Sylvain Lévi, to examine the Nirukta manu-
scripts in the Bibliotheque Nationale, Nos.
257-64, described by Cabaton in the Cafa/ogue
sommaire des Manuscrits Sanskrits et Pali, pp. 39-
40. All of them, except the first collated by
Roth, belong to the nineteenth century. They

all represent the text of the longer recension,
and do not afford any other variants. The
contents of Nos. 263 and 264 is Durga's
commentary, which comes to an end with
the twelfth chapter.

* Vol. i, p. 297.

3 See Bib. Ind. ed., vol. i, pp. 2-4.

* Loc. cit. (Aufrecht).

 


50 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

(8) But the most important of all these commentators is Durga. He
seems to be later than Devarajayajvan who is familiar with the then extant
commentaries on the Vedas, the Nigh@ntu, and the Nirukta, and who does
not mention Durga in the long list of the authorities used by him for the
purpose of his own work. Although a conclusion based on the argument
of silence is not cogent, yet in this particular case, it is justified to assume
that Durga is not referred to because he was posterior to Devaraja, hence
Durga would also be later than Skandasvami. - Durga's commentary is
published, and has superseded the works of his predecessors. His work
is important for two reasons: (1) he is the last of the commentators, and
therefore represents the fullest development of the traditional interpretation
of the Nirukta ; (2) the very fact that it has survived at the cost of earlier
commentaries indicates its importance. We shall therefore examine his

work somewhat in detail.

Date of Durga.

It has already been pointed out that in all probability he is later than
Devarijayajvan, though this assumption hardly helps us, for the date of
Devarija himself is not known. However, Durga's lower limit can be
determined almost with certainty. A manuscript? of his commentary in the
Bodleian Library is dated 1387 .). The date is genuine and is accepted as
such by Professor A. B. Keith." The manuseript was copied at Bhrgu Ksetra
in the reign of Maharana-Durgasimhavijaya. Thus he could not be
later than 1387 a.p. It is difficult to identify any particular site with Bhrgu
Ksetra, but probably it was situated somewhere between the Sarasvati and
the Jamna. As Durga wrote his commentary in a hermitage near Jammu,
a place not casily accessible in the absence of modern means of communi-
cation, the migration of the MS. of his commentary to Bhrgu Ksetra
presupposes the lapse of sufficient time in order to account for the spreading
of his fame as a commentator from the isolated heights of Jammu to the
plains of Bhrgu Ksetra. It will not be far from the truth, therefore, to
place Durga about the thirteenth century A. D.

Durga does not speak of any predecessors by name nor does he lcav
any clue as to the sources of his own commentary. Unlike Devarija-
yajvan, he does not give the slightest information about himself or the
general state of the Nirukt« during his time. That he wrote his com-
mentary in a hermitage near Jammu is proved by the colophon® on f. 132 v.
at the end of the cleventh chapter of the Nirukta, which runs as follows :

1 MS. Wilson 475. Bodleian Library, vol. ii, p. 108.
? See Calaloque of Sanskri! Manuscripts in the 5 MS. Wilson 175.

 


COMMENTATORS OF YASKA 51

ऋज्वथायां निरुक्तवृत्तौ जम्ब्मागाशमनिवासिन आचार्यभगवद्रुर्गसिंहकृतो
ध्यायस्य चतुर्थ: पाद: समाप्त: । This shows that the full name of the
commentator was Durgasitirha. The fact that he lived in a hermitage and
was addressed as bhagavat indicates that he was an ascetic and belonged to
some particular order of Sannyisa. Further, he is a descendant of the
family of the Vasisthas. He does not explain the stanza RV. III. 58. 23,
quoted ' by Yaska to illustrate the meaning of the word lodkam, because

the stanza implies hostility to Vasistha. He says: vu we: सा
afavafuitt #q 1 #g a atfugan । अतस्तां न नित्रवीमि । 'The stanza,
in which this word (/odhkam) occurs is hostile to Vasistha. And I am a
descendant of Vasistha, belonging to the Kapisthala branch, hence I do
not explain the stanza.' *

Sayana has the following note on it: YT aq विश्चामित्रशिप्य: सुदानाम
शाजिरासीत् । स च केनचित् कारणेन वसिष्ठद्देष्योऽभूत् । विश्चामित्रस्तु शिष्यस्य
। इम अमिशापरूपा: । ता ऋचो वसिष्ठा न शृण्वन्ति ।

'There was formerly a royal sage named Sudäs, a disciple of
mitra. Somehow, he became an object of Vasistha's hatred. Then,
mitra, in order to protect his disciple, reviled Vasistha with these stanzas.
These are the imprecatory stanzas. The Vasisthas do not pay any attention
(lit. listen) to them.'} This corroborates Yaska's statement that there are
stanzas which contain asseveration and imprecation only.

Durga's commentary is important for it repeats every word of Yaska,
thus the text of the Nirukta 'in toto" could be reproduced from Durga's
work alone. As none of the manuscripts collated by me is older than the
fifteenth century, Durga supplies therefore evidence of a very valuable
character for the textual criticism of the NYirukia. The number of variants
attributed by Durga to his predecessors and his frequent remarks that the
text is corrupt and that the right reading is to be discovered,-all such
cases I have pointed out in my notes-indicate that there has been no
unbroken tradition with regard to the handing down of the text of the
Niruktu.

Further there seems to have been some sort of revival of the study of
the Nirukta in the neighbourhood of Jammu in Durga's time, for it seems
difficult to imagine that in an isolated place like Jammu, Durga sat down
to write his commentary simply for the love of writing a commentary.
It is more reasonable to suppose that Durga accomplished this task in order

! The Nirubta, iv. 14. edition of the Nirukta, vol. ii, p. 416. Cf.
* Durga's Commentary on the N. iv. 14, Muir, Sanskrit Texts.
3 Sayana on RV. III. 53. Cf, Bib. Ind. 4 N. vii. 8.

p 2

 


52 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

to meet the demand for a good text, elucidation of obscure passages, and
amplification of Yaska's arguments, a demand which a revival of the study
of the Nirukta had called forth. The examination of the manuscript of
Durga's commentary, mentioned above, leads one to the conclusion that
Durga did not live to complete his work and that he himself wrote his
commentary up to the end of the 1ith chapter only. This is indicated by
a comparison of colophons in the manuscript which, at the end of the
7th-12th chapters, numbered as 12-17 by Durga consecutively from the
five chapters of the Nighantu, are as follows :

(1) At the end of 5९ 7फ लो, ७० ।, 507. ॥ द्दादशोध्याच: ॥

(@) ; ॥ 8th chap. ००५ १. 70 ४. ॥ इति निरुत्तावृत्तौ at... wig: i

(8) ) फ ढाच्कू- ०५ ।. 86 v. ॥ ऋज्वथायां निरु . . . समाप्त: ॥

(4) ॥; ,) - 1l0th chap.on ।. 1127, ॥ ऋज्व . . , पंचदशोध्याय: समाप्त: ॥

(5) _ . s -_ 11th chap. on ।. 182 v. ॥ ऋज्वथीचयां निरुक्तवृत्तौ जंब्मा-
गाशअमनिवासिन आचार्यमगवहगसिंहकतो षोडशस्याध्यायस्य चतुर्थ: पाद:
समाप्त: ॥

A comparison of these five colophons shows that the first four do not
contain any reference to Durga by name nor to his honorific titles, which
fact implies that they were written by Durga himself, while that at the
end of the 11th chapter was added by some disciple, who speaks of Durga
as an dedrya and addresses him as bhagavat. Durga could not have
appropriated these titles himself unless he was very vain. Another point
in favour of the fifth colophon being written by a person other than Durga
is that while the first four colophons say that such and such a chapter has
come to an end, the fifth remarks that such a pada of that chapter has come
to an end. The colophon at the end of the 11th chapter is the final inscription
and as such should have been placed at the end of the 12th chapter, where
no such description is found; the colophon there, on 1. 150 "., ७०5 ॥ सप्तदशस्य

चतुर्थ: पाद:॥ - This leads one to the conclusion that Durga himself wrote
his commentary up to the end of the 11th chapter, whose colophon was
adlded by a disciple who also wrote the commentary on the 12th chapter,
and faithfully refrained himself from adding the name of Durga in the
colophon at the end of the 12th chapter. MS. Mill 142, dated A. p. 1889,
and described in the Culalogues of Sunskril Munmuscripts in the Bodleian
Library by Keith, also preserves the final inscription at the end of the
11th chapter, while on f. 123 v., at the end of the 12th chapter it simply

5५४5 ॥ सप्तदशस्य चतुर्थ: पाद: ॥ 115 also to be noticed that in this manuscript

! Vol. ii, p. 108.

 


COMMENTATORS OF YASKA 53

as well, the word adhky@yu only is used in the carlier colophons while pada
makes its appearance in those at the end of the 11th and the 12th chapters.
Another point of minor importance may also be adduced in this con-
nexion, ic. the manuscripts have the following sloke at the end of the

12th chapter.

स्त्यभिलाषे यथा कामी करोत्यंगविचेष्टितम् ।

स्त्रीसमक्षं तथा कुयादयं ॥
As Durga is shown to be a hermit, to ascribe these verses to him will be
highly inappropriate.

Durga and the Parisista.

Both the published editions of Durga's commentary regard the com-
mentary on the portions of the 13th chapter as an integral part of Durga's
work. But the MS. Wilson 475, dated 18387 a.p., and MS. Mill 142},
dated 1839 a.p., do not contain the commentary on the 13th chapter. In
both these manuscripts the commentary is completed at the end of the
12th chapter and the MS. Mill 142, expressly say that the work is finished.

॥ समाप्तो ग्रन्थ: ॥

Moreover, the 13th chapter was not added to the NVirukta by Durga's time,
as is proved by his remark in the introductory part of his commentary :

अयं च तस्या द्वादशाध्यायी भाष्यविस्तर: ।
तस्येदमादिवाक्यन् । समाम्नाय: समाम्नात: ॥

'And this (the Nirukta) is its (the Nighuntw's) araplified commentary
consisting of twelve chapters whose first sentence is " a list has been handed
down by tradition ".' Hence the commentary on the 13th chapter was
written at a later period and attributed to Durga by some disciple or
follower of his.

Yaska's contributions to Etymology, Philology, and Semantics.
1. Date of Yaska.

History is the one weak point of Sanskrit literature, being practically
non-existent. Not a single systematic chronological record has survived,
and so complete is the lack of any data to guide us in this matter that
the dates of even the most famous Indian authors like Panini and
Kalidasa are still subject to controversy. Yaska's date cannot therefore
be determined with absolute certainty. One can arrive at a relative date

* This evidence is, however, inadequate. _ view I am now systematically examining and
To make the case plausible, it must be corro- - comparing the commentary on the twelfth
borated by the internal evidence, i.e. the - with that of the preceding chapters. Later
difference of style, treatment, &e. - With this _ on I shall add the result of my examination.

 


54 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

only by bringing together the isolated pieces of information supplied by
archaeological finds, literary references, and accidental mention of known
historical or political events. This evidence, however, is not conclusive,
and is differently interpreted by various oriental scholars. There is a
great difference of opinion among them about the precise date of Väska,
but at the same time there is also the unanimity which sets down his
lower limit as not later than 500 B.C. As this limit has not been
questioned so far (while his upper limit is carried as far as 700 B.C.), it may
therefore be safely assumed that Yaska lived at least about a century
carlier than Plato. - Both Vaska and Plato sum up as it were the results of
their predccessors in philological and etymological investigations in the
Nirukta and the Cratylus respectively. Both stand pre-eminent with
regard to their age, and have dominated the thought of succeeding genera-
tions in their respective countries. Yaska's work is important for the
history of philology and etymology. And as the representative record of
the researches of ancient Indians, it is of considerable interest for a com-
parative study of the Indian and Greek achievements in these two branches
of knowledge in the earliest period of their history.

2. Phonetic equipment of Väska.

Before we proceed to examine, in detail, the principles laid down by
Yaska for etymology, or his speculations in philology, it will be worth
while to inquire whether Yaska was a properly qualified person to under-
take the task, i.e. whether he possessed any knowledge of sound-laws,
or, in other words, whether he received any phonetic training, and of
what sort? As has already been pointed out, historical and biographical
records about ancient India do not exist, or at least, if they existed,
have not survived. Nothing definite is, therefore, known about the life
of Yaska, nor about the period in which he lived, nor about the educational
system which then prevailed. In the absence of such records it is there-
fore extremely difficult to ascertain the worth of his qualifications, or the
extent of, and his familiarity with, sound-laws. Yet some indirect in-
formation can be pieced together by collecting a few isolated data capable
of throwing some light on the subject. In the first place, Vaska is
acquainted with a vast amount of Sanskrit literature. The numerous
exemplary quotations occurring in the conclusively show that
he knew the Rg-veda, the Sama-veda, the Atharva-veda, the Vajur-veda,
and their puda-pathus, the Tuittiriya Surmthitd, the Maitrayant Samhita,
the Kathaka Samhita, the Aitareya Br&hrmamna, the Gopatho Brahmana,
the Kousituki Brahnmurma, the Salapatha Brahmana, the Pratisakhyas,

 


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 55

and some of the Upanjsads. The full list of all the works known to him
is given in the Appendix. 'This shows that Yaska was a man of compre-
hensive knowledge and vast reading. Secondly, he refers to and quotes
the opinions of the various schools of thought which existed in his time,
i.c. the school of etymologists, the school of grammarians, the school of
ritualists, the school of legendists, the school of Naiddnas (i.e. specialists,
in primary causes). Further, he discusses and criticizes the views of many
authorities-his predecessors and contemporaries. The full list of these
is also given in the Appendix. 'The mention of eminent scholars and
schools of thought presupposes specialization in their respective depart-
ments of knowledge which implies some uniform system of training and
a sufficiently high order of education extending over a long period.
Otherwise it is difficult to conceive how these various schools could have
come into existence at all. Thus it can be assumed without much doubt
that Yaska had received some kind of training in one, or more than one,
of these schools. He discusses the doctrines of the schools other than
his own, and thus seems to have acquired a general familiarity with them
to be able to do so. Thirdly, he distinctly mentions the pr&t/s£khyas,
ie. phonetic treatises which record the researches made by ancient
Indians in the physiological and the acoustic aspects of Phonetics. These
treatises themselves presuppose the existence of the pad i-pathas, i.e.
'the word texts", which give every word of the summ//it@ in its isolated
state, ie. free from the euphonic combinations, and analyse compounds
into their component elements. Gradually by the time of Yaska, a strong
phonetic feeling had come into existence, as is evident from the scientific
arrangement and classification of the Sanskrit alphabet. 'This shows
that Yaska was furnished with some phonetic equipment. such as
the state of the scholarship of the time permitted him to aequire. This
view is supported by the fact that Yaska is familiar with and recognizes

the following phonetic phenomena: (1) Syncope as in TY: (they went)
from the root TH (to go); (2) Metathesis as in T&T 'a drop' from 34
(to drop), Tf: (rope) from ¥ (to emit), and तज्ञै 'knife' from #q (to cut),
and so on; (3) Anaptyxis, as in Hq from the root X4 (to throw), TT:
(door) from the root 4 (to cover), HiT: from the root Het (to fry), &c.;
(4) haplology as in J= tri + rea, i.c.' three stanzas '." He is also acquainted
with assimilation, and has noticed an example of prakrtization in the
Rg-veda while explaining कुटस्य ।'; (N. v. 24). For the detailed
account of his observations on phonetic phenomena see Chapter II, sections

) All these words are found in the Nirukte, ii. 1-2, I have cited examples furnished by
Yaska himself.

 


56 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

1-2. From what has gone before, it may be concluded that Yaska was
a man of extensive reading, that he had pursued a systematic course of
study, and that he was furnished with some phonetic equipment. / This con-
clusion is further supported by the fact that his explanations are pervaded
with a rationalistic spirit and devoid of the mystifying or supernatural
element, a characteristic of the ritualist and the parivrajaku school, cf.
e.g. Yaska's explanation of Væ(rc. He is altogether free from fanaticism,
bigotry, and intolerance when he meets Kautsa's adverse criticism of what
he believes to be the revealed hymns, but gives rational answers to the
various points of objection. He is actuated by a scientific spirit even
when he is dealing with gods. Thus, for instance, he classifies gods into
various groups, i.e. the terrestrial, the atmospheric, and the celestial
according to the sphere of their activity, and assigns definite functions
to each. Yaska's classification of gods has nothing corresponding to it
in the mythologies of other nations. Further, his treatment of synonyms
and homonyms is also scientific. At first he attributes a particular meaning
to a particular word, and then supports his assertion by quoting a passage,
generally from the Vedic literature, in which that word is used in that
particular sense. Whether or not one agrees with him in attributing
particular meanings to particular words, it cannot be denied that his
method is scientific and, notwithstanding his remote antiquity, surprisingly
modern,. This scientific spirit, so evident in the Nirwkta, could be developed
by a scientific training only. In the absence of any definite information,
the preceding statement will, I think, give some indication as to Yaska's
qualifications to undertake the task which he set before himself.

3. Importance of Etymology.

Taking both the East and the West together, Yaska is the first writer
on etymology. He is also the first to treat it as a science by itself.
According to the orthodox Indian tradition, the Nirukte@ has, for a long
time, been recognized as a treatise which deals specially with etylllology.
But the claim of Yaska is not based on this recognition. He has enunciated
his doctrines in the Nirukta. His remarks on the importance of etymology
may sound very commonplace to us, but probably appeared to have the
same' profoundness of wisdom when they were first uttered about 2,500
years ago, as President Wilson's fourteen points for the modern political
world. - His arguments for etymology are summarized as follows:

(1) Etymology is essential for the proper understanding of the Vedic
texts.

 


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 57

(2) Etymology is the complement of grammar

(3) Etymology is necessary for the analysis of the sumAi{d into the
pada-patha, and of words into their component elements.

(4) Etymology has practical utility, for it enables one to discover the
primary deity of a stanza which bears the characteristic marks of more
than one deity, and thus helps to perform the sacrifice with perfection.

(5) Etymology is a science, and should be studied for its own sake,
for knowledge is commended, and ignorance is condemned. (Chapter I,
see. 15-17.)

4. Principles of Etymology.

Yaska's fundamental notion about language is, that all words can be
reduced to their primordial elements which he calls roots. With this idea
he lays great emphasis on the point that as every word can be traced
to an original root, one should never give up a word as underivable. His
first genera! principle is, One should give the etymological explanation
of words whose accent and grammatical form are regular, and are ac-
companied with a radical modification in the usual manner', i.e. in
accordance with the laws of phonology. One would hardly question the

derivation of from Uu 'to cook ', or of पाठक from TZ ' to read ', or of

«TY from ¥ 'to know', or of भेद from fee 'to break ', and so on. It should
be observed that Yaska recognized the importance of accent, and accords it
a due place in his principle. It is obvious that the above-mentioned rule
is limited in its scope, for only a comparatively small number of words can
fulfil the conditions therein laid down. Yaska therefore strikes a note
of warning and says that a disproportionate importance should not be
attached to grammatical form, for the rules of grammar are not universal
like laws of nature, and have many exceptions, adding that one has also to
take into consideration phonetic phenomena such as syncope, metathesis.
haplology, anaptyxis, assimilation, &e. His second principle is that in
case the accent and grammatical form are not regular, and are not ac-
companied with a radical modification,. one should always take his stand
on the meaning of the word and endeavour to derive it from some similarity
of form, or if there is no such similarity of form, even from the similarity
of a single letter or syllable. Thus, according to Yiaska, one should not
be afraid to derive, dois, dit, doive, dusse, &e. from devoir, ' to owe', or isti
(sacrifice) from the root yq; (to sacrifice) on account of the apparent
dissimilarity of their form. Comparative philology furnishes the best
examples to illustrate Yaska's remark that often there is hardly any
resemblance between a word and its original source, i.e. its primitive

\ Tad idam vidyä-sthänam vyükaranasya kärtsnyam. / N. i,15.

 


58 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

and derivative forms. Cf. IE. *penque; Skt. pa/ca; Zend. palica; Gk.
mæövre; Lat. quinque; läth. penke; Goth. funf; Germ. OE. fif; Eng.
five. Again. French /arme and English tear have only r in common, both
being otherwise quite different from their original source *dakru, which
assumed an Anglo-Saxon form tear, and a primitive Lat. dacru. The Eng.
ewe and Lat. ovis have nothing in common, and each has exclusively preserved
some parts of their original Fowis. Eng. four, Germ. vier, have only r in
common with (ik. rérrapes. Eng. quick (orig. 'alive') has only ? in common
with (ik. Bios (life). Eng. sit, and Gk. hed 'seat') have nothing
in common, and each has preserved one exclusive part of the original *sed.
Again, cf. IE. *jhans; Skt. hormsa; Gk. yfv; Lat. anser (for hanser);
Germ. Gans; OE. gos; Eng. goose.

But the application of this rule by an incompetent person gives rise
to grotesque results; many such cases are supplied by the Nirwkta, e.g.
Saka’péyana’s derivation of Sat-ya, the ya of which he formed from the
causal of 4, and Sat from as, 'to be'. Yaska foresaw the danger of the
misuse of his principle. So after laying down his rule, he adds a note of
warning. He urges that single words isolated from their context should
not be thus derived, for without a knowledge of the context, it is often
difficult to know the precise meaning of a word. He recommends that
derivations should not be explained for a person not acquainted, or not
well acquainted, with grammar, and not for one who has not studied
etymology as a pupil. He says, 'One should indeed explain derivations
for one's own pupil who has been in residence studying etymoiogy or for
one who is eapable of understanding; for the intelligent and for the
diligent. - N. ii. 3.

The third principle of etymology laid down by Väska is that one should
derive words in accordance with their meanings. 'If their meanings are
the same, their etymologies should be the same, if the meanings are
different, the etymologies should also be different (N. ii. 7.)

This principle is on the whole sound, for in every language there occurs
the phenomenon that words of different origin often assume the same form.
For instance :

Skt. Akita derived from the root a; means 'driven'.
$ K; bi » अ CGA - , - 'besmeared'.
Aja ,, । विदि ।। अ
» - Wot ॥ ,, » - » Jum Q, कला ',
Aiista / - am-ista from Vis means 'unwished'.
5 , v aj - , 'not sacrificed".

dA uwuddra = an-uddre means 'a niggardly man'.

 


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 59

Skt. Anudara = unu-dara means ' followed by a wife'.
॥ - a-pavunæ& - , / * without air^.

II

apa-vunmæ ॥, 'a grove'.
W - «u-UA8& nd, ., - 'not dressed.
Avasina = ava-sina __,, / * vesting-place?.

Apava in

English Abode. - From «bide, meaning * delay ? or <dwelling-place'.

Abode. OE. abedd-an, conneeted with the primitive verb heodan,

meaning ' prognostication ' ; cf. fore-bode.

Abound. OFr. abunder, abonder, ; Lat. abunddre, meaning

'to be plentiful.
» --= w-bownd, meaning ' to get limits to '.

Admiral. - OFr. amiral, derived from the Arabic amir-al, latinized in
various ways and assimilated according to popular forms,
meaning 'a naval officer '.

A by-form of admirable. OFr. amirable, Lat. admirdbil-em,
meaning ' exciting admiration '.

Adust. Lat. «dist-us, Fr. aduste, meaning ' seorched '.
B - a-dust, meaning 'in a dusty condition '.

Aught. OE. ght; OHG. ékt; Goth. aihkt-s, meaning * possession '.

OE. d, o+awhit; OHG. eowikt, iowiht, &e.; ME. oht, oght,
meaning ' anything whatever '.

Bay. OFr. baie; Lat. baea, meaning 'a small fruit, a berry '.

Fr. baie ; Lat. baiua, meaning 'an indentation of sea into land,
or of land iuto the seat.

OFr. buée; Lat. type badata, meaning ' the division of a barn '.

OFr. bay ; It. bada ; Lat. badare, 'to open the mouth ', meaning
barking or baying '.

Cf. ON. bagv, brgja, * to push back', meaning ' an embankment
or dam '.

Short form of bay-uniler, meaning < the secound branch of a
stag's horn '.

» -_ Fr. bai; Lat. badius, meaning 'a reddish-brown colour.

Beak. Fr. bee: It. beeco; Sp. bico; Late Lat. beceus, meaning 'a bird's Lill}.
» -_ 'A justice of the peace'.
);, A variant of beek, *to warm ?.

Bear. OE. bera; OHG. bero; Mod. G. bir; ef. ON. Lat.

ferus, meaning 'an animal '.
» OE. bere; ef. Goth,. barizeins, meaning ' barley '.
Si OE. and OHG. ber-un; ON. ber-u; Goth. buir-an; Lat. jer;
Ck. gep ; Skt. bhar, meaning ' to carry '.

?»

>

23

१

H

»»

»»

 


60 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

English Dole derived from French dewil means ' grief '.
,, _ related to Teut. deal; Ger. Teil means ' portion '.
Fume. Fr. fome; Lat. fama (report); Gk. gun, meaning 'public report!.
» -- Fr. faim; Lat. fumes; cf. OFr. afomer, meaning 'want of food.
hunger '.
» -_ Obsolete form of foam.
Fast. OE. festan; OHG. fastén; ON. fustu; Goth. fustan, meaning
' to abstain from food '.
» -_ ME fest; ON. fest-r, meaning 'a rope '.
» - Mr. /faste; Lat. fastus, meaning ' arrogance '.
Fold. OK. folde; OLG. folda; ON. fold, related to *felpu, field '.
meaning 'ground '.
d OE. fealdon ; OHG. fulda«; ON. falda ; Goth. falpam ; OTeut.
; cf. Lith. pleta ; (k. di-maA\ros, meaning 'to arrange
one thing over another '.
ï OE. falced ; Mod. LG. fult, meaning 'an enclosure for domestic
animals '.
ul ME. fuld; OHG. fult ; ON. fuld-r, meaning 'a bend or ply '.
Hound. OE. hund; OHG. hunt (d-); Goth hunds; ON,. huudr;
Ck. «dor, «uv; Skt. évun, meaning ' dog'.
» ME. Ain; ON. htiin, meaning 'a projection '.
Seal. OE. stol; OHG. selah ; ON. sel-r, meaning * an animal '.
» -_ OFr. seel; It. suggello ; Lat. sigillum, meaning 'a device ^,
Sound. - Derived from Fr. sow ; Lat. sowus, means *noise '^.
W OH. sund, means * strong ^.
E Fr. sonder; Lat. subwndaære, means * testing depths '.

French 4AZr. Gk. die; Lat. der-em; Sp. aire, meaning (the gaseous
substance which envelopes the carth '.
त OFr. wire, meaning ' disposition '.

Bs 1t. «riu, meaning 'melody '.
Champs. Lat. campus; It. campo ; Sp. compo, meaning ' field'.
» OFr. eant, meaning * side ?.

Chere. - Feminine of cher, ' dear'.
8 Ok. yapdé, ' face'.
Cousin, -e. Lat. consobrinus; It. cugino, -a ; Sp. sobrino, -a; Pig.
sobrirho, -a, meaning 'a relative '.

,, Lat. culici/iwus, meaning ' an insect '.
Devunt. Preposition meaning ' before'.
n Ir. participle of devoir, to owe '.

Feu, Lat. focus; It. fuoco; Sp. fuego; Ptg. foyo ; OFr. fou, mean-

ing fire'.


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 61

French Fex. Derived by Estionne and Scheler from Lat. fuit >Jeut > feu ; by
Ménage from Lat. feliz felicis zfelce-jfew; by Littré from
OFr. fuhu > feii, connecting with Lat. fututus, meaning
'dead '.
Fier, Lat. fdare for (fidere); It. fidure; Sp. and Ptg. fur, meaning
*to put confidence '.
» - Lat. ferus; It. and Sp. fiero ; Pig. fero, meaning 'proud '.
Firme. Lat. frmus ; MBE. ferme, meaning *firm ^; ef. Skt. y dA/.
Med. Lat. firma, meaning, a farm '.

»)
Frane. Lat. franeus; It. franco; Sp. and Ptg. franco, meaning 'free'.
as Meaning 'a French coin '.
Geste. / Lat. gestus, meaning, ' gesture '.
Lat. gesta; It. gesta, meaning heroic deed, poetry"; cf, chanson
de geste.
Louer derived from Lat. locare means : to let '.
,, 8; M , - laudare means ' to praise'.

Z]

German «cht. OHG. ahto; MHQ. «he; Goth. uhtaw ; OB. eahta, derived
from an IE. root ; ef. Skt. astaw ; Gk. okré; Lat. octo; Lith.
asztuni, meaning ® eight '.

, ___ _OHG. éhta ; MHG. dhte ; OE. oht, meaning ' proscription '.

Bull. - From Lelien, meaning 'barking'.

,, MHG. bul, bulles; cognate with OHG. ballo; MHG. balle; ME.
tal, bulle ; OTeut. *ballon, *ballon ; ef. Lat. foll-is, ' something
inflated '; Fr. buille, meaning ' a ball to play with '.

y Fr. bul ; It. ballo; Fr. baler or baller; Lat. ballare; Gk. BaXAA\i¢0,
meaning 'a dance'.

Bauer. OHG. b&r; MHG. bir; LG. buur; ON. bir; OE. bir, ' dwel-
ling'; ef. neighbour; OEF. néah-gebir and naeh-bar; E.
bower; OTeut. *buro(m), from Teut. W68; IE. /bhu ; ef.
Skt. thu (bhami, 'earth'); Uk. pio; Lat. fui ( futurus) :
meaning * bird-cage '.

- OHG. büd»; MHG. büarære ; ef. Erbauer, Ackerbauer, from the
cultivate'; Du. bouwen; MHG., MDu. Ldiwew;
meaning 'a peasant '.

Bulle, MLG. bulle; MDu. bulle; Du. bul, bol; ON. bule, boli; MKE.
bole (boole); ef. ME. bule, bulle and E. bull, bullock; meaning
'u buffalo '.

$: MHG. bulle; OEF. bulle; E. bull; Fr. bulle, derived from Lat.
balla, meaning 'a papal mandate '.


62 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

German Geiseln. Pl. of geisel, OHG. gisal; MHG. gisel ; OH. gisel, meaning
© hostages '.
, __ A form of geisseln, MHG. geiseln, meaning * to wlnp
Kehren. OHG. kéeran ; MHG. kéren, meaning 'to sweep '.
,, OHG. kerian ; MHG. kern, meaning 'to turn '.
Kiefer. OHG. kienforhu;, MHG. icienbomn and the corresponding
word to OHG. *Akienforke; ef. Kien and Fohre, meaning
*: Scoteh fir, pine tree'.
MHG. kiver, kivel, kivele; OSaxon. kéflos; OF, cedfl, meaning
jaw '.
Kiel. - OHG. kiol, chiol; MLG. kél, kil; MHG. kiet; OF. céol ; OS. kiol,
meaning ' keel '.
MHG. lil; LG. quiele; E. quill, meaning 'a piece of reed or
feather of a bird '.
Luden. OHG. hladamny MHG. laden ; OS. Madan; OEF. kladan ; Goth.
(af )halpan ; E. lade, meaning 'to load '.
OHG. ladon; MHG. laden; Goth. lapon ; OE. ladian, meaning

»
1)

»
shop'. ।
Mandel. MLG. MDu. mande; OE. mand, mond; E. mawnd, meaning
'to count by fifteen '.
OHG. mandula ; MHG. munudel ; OFr. ulmande, also amande,
amuaundre; cf. Sp. almendru ; It. mandorla, mandola, mean-

U]

ing ' almond '.

Mark. OHG. marka; MHG. marke; OS. marka ; OE. meare, meaning
© boundary '.

MHG. mark; MDu. mare; ON. mork; OE. mare; Med. Lat.
marea, marcus; Fr. more; It. marco. marca, meaning
'a coin '.

OHG. marg, marag; MHG. mare, marg; OS. marg; OE.
mears, meurh ; MDu. march, marg; Mod. Du. merg; OTeut.
*muzgo; cf. AV. mazqa ; Skt. majjun, meaning *the soft
fatty substance of bones. ।

Reis. OHG. hriis; MHG. ris; ON. hris; MDu. Du. rigs; OF. lhris,
meaning ' twigs or small branches '.

MHG. ris; MLG. riis; ME. rys: OF». ris: It. riso;, Lat.
*orizum ; Gk. épyfa ; ef. Skt. vrihi, meaning 'rice'.

Hindi kame derived from Skt. kp _- means ' work'.

kane - ,, - 'love'.

»)

»

») 3 ?) 3)

Examples might be multiplied. It is clear that such words can be satis-
factorily derived only with reference to their meaning, for being derivable


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 63

from more than one original source, they are liable to be connected with
the wrong root unless the derivation is based on the meaning. Yaska's
rule is therefore sound. But in criticism of Yaska's rule, it may be
remarked that words, having the same origin, come to acquire different
meanings. - For instance, Lat. cup(eupido), 'to desire', and Skt. kup, 'to
be angry', have the same common origin. Again, ef. IE. klutds; Skt.
Srulds; Gk. kAurés; Lat. (in)clutus; OE. had; Eng. loud. Yaska did not
know any other language besides Sanskrit, his horizon was therefore
necessarily limited, yet his familiarity with the two phases of the Sanskrit
language, i.e. the Vedic and the classical, which is historically the develop-
ment of the former, and which in their relation to cach other bear a close
correspondence to that of the Tonic and the Attic tongues, placed him on
a better working ground than those who were not fully conscious of such
historical development. There is no passage in the Cratylus, for instance,
showing that Plato realized that the Attic was historically the outgrowth
of the Tonic language. On the contrary, the following passage indicates
that he was not aware of any such development.

5. Plato on Etymology.

Soc. 'Yes, my dear friend ; but then you know that the original names
have been long ago buried and disguised by people sticking on and
stripping off letters for the sake of euphony, and twisting and bedizening
them in all sorts of ways. . . . And the additions are often such that at
last no human being can possibly make out the original meaning of the
word."" - Again, Plato does not recognize that etymology has any scientific
or even systematic basis. He does not seem to realize that derivation of
words should be governed by some general rules In addition to the
above, I quote the following passage in support of my statement :

Soc. . . . 'Now attend to me; and first, remember that we often put
in and pull out letters in words and give names as we please and change
the accents.? Evidently he did not attach much importance to accent.
The only principle, which can hardly be so called, is contained in the
following passage :

Soc. . . . . 'And whether the syllables of the name are the same or
not the same, makes no difference, providing the meaning is retained; nor
does the addition or subtraction of a letter make any difference so long

1 Jowett, Dialogues of Plato (3rd ed.), vol i, p. 358.
* Ibid. p. 341.


64 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

as the essence of the thing remains in possession of the name and
appears in it.''

These three passages from the Cratylus indicate that Plato looked
upon etymology as a compendium of individual conjecture which would
justify Voltaire's famous satire that, 'Etymology is a science in which
vowels count for nothing and consonants for very little", and Max Muller's
well-known epigram that, 'a sound etymology has nothing to do with
sound '. The fundamental difference between Yaska and Plato is that the
former distinguished roots from affixes and suffixes, i.e. the radical from
the formative element, and hence was able to formulate general principles
for analysing words into their constituent parts; the latter did not realize
this distinction and consequently made conjecture the basis of etymology.
It may be remarked, however, that Sanskrit is generally acknowledged to
be more perspicuous than Greek; it was easier therefore to see this dis-
tinction in Sanskrit than it was in Greek, and besides YaAska had the
advantage of inheriting this knowledge from a long line of predecessors
who had made this discovery at a very early period. But Yaska's
greatness, even if every one of his etymological explanations is proved
to be wrong-as many are manifestly so,-lies in the fact that he is the
first to claim a scientific foundation, and also the first to formulate general

principles for etymology.

6. Philological speculations of Yasku.

In two aphoristic rules, Yaska enunciates his view as to why articulate
speech is given preference to other modes of expression, such as gestures,
movements of hands and body, &c. He says, ' words are used to designate
objects with regard to everyday affairs in the world, on account of their
comprehensiveness and minuteness'* Durga, the commentator of
explains the term 'comprehensiveness', with regard to the psychological
process involved in the apprehension of meaning through the instrumentality
of the spoken word. He says that there are two phases of consciousness
in the human mind, i.e. (1) the manifest, and (2) the unmanifest. When &
person desires to express the manifest consciousness, his effort results in the
exhalation of breath which modified in the various speech-organs produces
the word. The word again pervades the unmanifest consciousness of the
hearer, makes it manifest, and thus the meaning is apprchended.® Using
philological terminology, we may express the same thing by saying that
there are permanent word-records in the sub-conscious strata of the human

! Jowett, Dialogues of Plato (Brd ed.), vol. i, 2 The Nirukta, i. 2.

p. 335. 3 Durga on N. i. 2.


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 65

mind. 'These word-records are brought from the sub-conscious to the
conscious state by articulated speech. It may be objected that what-
ever the psychological process may be, the most important use of the word
is to express and convey the meaning to somebody else, and this purpose can
equally be accomplished by other methods, such as gestures, movements of
hands, face, and eyes. As if Yaska had anticipated this objection, he adds
the term '(minuteness' in his aphorism. - Durga has the following comment:
The movements of hands and the winking of the eyes, &e., are also com-
prehensive, they will express the meaning and in this manner we will be
saved the trouble of studying grammar and the bulky Vedic literature.
True, gestures, &e., are comprehensive, but they are not minute, i.e. they
involve greater effort in production and are always indefinite. Even
discarding Durga's claborate explanation of 'comprehensiveness', Yaska's
aphorism can mean only that words are used in the everyday affairs of
the world because they are capable of giving expression to every kind of
meaning with their numerous shades of difference, and are produced with
comparatively less exertion. There seems to be no doubt that at the time
of writing the above-mentioned aphorism, Yaska had in his mind the
alternative method of expression by means of gestures, &e. And his argu-
ment that words are preferred to gestures, on account of the economy of
effort, has a strikingly modern note.

m

7. Origin of Language.

Naska is a follower of the school of etymologists,. whose fundamental
doctrines is that all words are derived from original roots..  Gargya and
the followers of the school of grammarians do not agree with him.? There
is also a short discussion about onomatopoeia.* Aupamanyava maintains
that there is no such thing as onomatopoeia, but Vaska holds that there are
some words which are formed by the mere imitation of sounds of nature,
mostly the names of birds, such as erow. partridge, &e., but which can be
derived otherwise also. - It is surprising that in this connexion he does not
mention the word cuckoo. - Besides the names of birds, he thinks that the
following words are similarly formed. - Kitava®*, 'a gambler'; dundubhi5,
'a drum'; ciscd kruoti®, 'it makes a cisca sound'; krka', the former
part of Arkaraku, 'a cock". According to Yaska, onomatopoeia does not
play any important part in the foundation of language. He discards

1 Nirukta,i. 12. 5 Tid. ix. 12,
* Loc. cit. 5 Ibid. ix. 14.
3 Op. eit. ili, 18. T Ibid. xii. 13.
* Inid. v. 22


66 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

therefore the so-called Bow-wow theory) As Yaska reduces all words to
primordial roots, he may therefore be regarded as an adherent of the
root-theory.

This again affords a point of difference from the Oratylus, where Plato,
in attempting to trace the origin of the sounds of the alphabet to the
sounds of nature, considers onomatopoeia to be the most important factor
in the formation of language. As an objection to his theory, it may be
remarked that the objects with which men in primitive society are most
familiar would be things like 'cave', ' pit', 'tree', &c. and the naming
of these objects precludes all imitation of natural sounds. Words like
' digger", ' weaver', &e., would represent a higher stage of civilization."

8. Parts of Speech.

Yaska says that there are four parts of speech: noun and verb,
preposition and particle" At first sight, it seems inexplicable that an
ancient author like Yaska should mention preposition as a part of speech
and should ignore adverbs which historically can be shown to have been
evolved at an earlier stage of the linguistic development than the former.
The difficulty, however, disappears when it is remembered that prepositions
in Sanskrit are seldom used to express case relations, but mostly serve as
adverbial prepositions. With Yaska's division of speech into four parts
may be compared the remarks of Dionysius of Halicarnassus, who
attributes a similar classification to Aristotle.

:Composition is . . . . a certain arrangement of the parts of speech.
.. . These were reckoned as three only by Theodectes and Aristotle and
the philosophers of those times, who regarded nouns, verbs, and connectives
as the primary parts of speech. Their successors, particularly the leaders
of the Stoic school, raised the number to four, separating the article from
the connectives.'* According to Aristotle, 'Diction viewed as a whole is
made up of the following parts: the letter (or the ultimate element), the
syllable, the conjunction, the article, the noun, the verb, the case, and the
speech," 5

O. Aristotle's definition of Nown and Verb.

Yaska defines the noun and the verb as follows: (A verb has
becoming as its fundamental notion, a noun has leing as its funda-
mental notion. But where both (i.e. becoming and being) are dominated
by becoming as in a verbal noun), a becoming arising from a former

! Max Muller, Science of Language, vol. i, 1 Literary Composition, ch. iii, Roberts's ed.,
pp. 407. 17. p. 71.
2 See also Max Muller, loc, cif. 5 Poetics, 20. 1456 b, By water's ed., p. 57.

5 Nirukta, i, 1.


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY,. AND SEMANTICS 67

to a later state is denoted by a verb, as 'he goes", 'he cooks', &c.; while
the embodiment of the whole process beginning with the original and
ending with the final conception, which has assumed the character of
being, is denoted by a noun, as ' going ', ' cooking ', &e.' - Further, becoming
has six modifications: (1) genesis, (2) existence, (3) alteration, (4) growth,
(5) decay, and (6) destruction. With these may be compared Aristotle's
definitions of noun and verb. 'A noun or name is a composite signi-
ficant sound not involving the idea of time, with parts which have no
significance by themselves in it. . . . A verb is a composite significant
sound involving the idea of time, with parts which have no significance by
themselves in it. Whereas the word 'man' or 'white' does not imply
when, ' walks' and 'has walked ' involve in addition to the idea of walking
that of time present or time past.' °

In his definition of a verb, Aristotle lays great emphasis on the idea
of time, but ignores the idea of action involved in it : his definition is
therefore incomplete and states the element of lesser importance only, for
of the two ideas of action, and time, the former is of primary and the
latter of secondary significance. Yaska has hit on the right word, i.e.
becomimg which expresses both, the notion of action and time as well.
Aristotle's definition of a noun is a negative one. He explains what it
does not involve, but not what it positively does involve. Yaska, on the
other hand, gives a positive definition, setting forth being to be the
fundamental notion of a noun. Further, he also defines a verbal noun,
which is ignored by Aristotle.

Yaska explains prepositions as words which bring into prominence the
subordinate meaning of nouns and verbs. He then subjoins a list of
twenty prepositions assigning to each its appropriate meaning. Proceeding
further, he divides particles into three groups, (1) comparatives, (2) con-
junctives, and (8) expletives. He defines these terms, giving a list of the
particles of each group, explaining their meanings and illustrating their
uses by suitable quotations from Vedic literature. They are treated in
detail in the first chapter of the Nirukta (see. 3-9).

Yaska observes the dialectical differences in the spoken language of
his time. Thus he points out certain characteristics of the speech of the
Aryans and the Kambojas, the people of the East, and the people of the
North! He acknowledges the rolation of the classical to the Vedic
Sanskrit. Thus he remarks that their vocabulary is identical," that their
use of prepositions and particles with occasional exceptions is similar.*

1 Nirukta, 1. 1. 4 Nirukta, ii. 2.
? Op. cit. i. 2. 5 Op. cit. i. 16.
3 Poetics, 20, 1156 b. 10, Bywater's ed., p. 58. 8 Op. cit. 1, 3-9.

E 2


68 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

He seems to be conscious of the historical connexion of the two languages
when he says that the words of the one are derived from the roots of the
other. He knows that it is not nouns only, but also verbs, which have
synonyms. 'So many verbs have the same meaning. So many are the
synonymi of a noun (lit. being).'* He explains homonym as a word which
has more than one meaning.} He also notices certain idiomatic expressions,
whose order is immutably fixed as ' Indra and Agni', father and son ', but
not ' Agni and Indra®', ' son and father '*

Semantics.
How names are given.

The epoch of Yaska was an age of remarkable literary activity. There
seems to be a general striving after the search of truth in all the depart-
ments of human knowledge. On the philosophic side, it marks the
beginning of the Upanisadie period which preached monotheism of an
exalted type, and gave expression to some of the sublimest thoughts ever
recorded in the history of mankind. On the religious side, it was the
harbinger of the Buddha who was soon to carry out a campaign of
vigorous protestantism against the then prevailing ritualistic practices,
Even in the matter of style, it is the period of transition which ushered in
the era of the aphorism As shown above, the age was busy with
grammatical and philological speeulations, nor was semantics ignored. In
the first chapter of the Nérukt@ (see 12-14), Yaska discusses the question,
how names are given. - The most important arguments are set forth in the
form of questions and answers. A critie is introduced who raises the
various points of objection, each of which is duly answered by the author.
It is a dialogue consisting of two monologues which are put in the mouths
of the critic and the author in succession. The arguments are as follows:
(1) Every being who performs a particular action should be called by the
same name, e.g. every one who runs on the road should be called «svæ
(runner), and not the horse alone; everything that pricks, as a needle
or spear for instance, should be called tng (pricker) and not a blade of
grass alone. (2) Every being should be given as many names as the
actions with which that particular being is associated, e. g. a pillar should be
called not s&s(J4£n«& (i.e. which stands upright) only, but also dard say@
(i.e. which rests in a hole), and also samanti (i.e. which is joined with the
beams). (3) Only such words should be used in giving names as are
regularly derived from roots according to the rules of grammar, so that

\ Nirukta, il. 2. 2 Op. cit. i. 20, 3 Op, cif. iv. 1. 1 Op. cH. i. 16,


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 69

the meaning of the object which they denote, should be quite clear and free
from doubt, e.g. purus«y (man) should be puri-saye (ie. city-dweller);
asva (horse) = ast« (i. c. runner); typ« (grass) = tardanma (pricker) and so
on. (4) If the name of an object is to be determined by its actions, the
being precedes the action (e.g. the horse comes into existence before it
actually runs), the designation of a being, which is carlier. from an action,
which is subsequent to it, is not tenable (perhaps for the reason that it
will leave the being nameless during the interval) (5) People indulge in
sophistry in explaining names, as for instance, when it is said that carth
(prthivi) is so called on account of its being broad (pruthk), they do not
consider as to who made it broad and on what basis.

Rejoinder.

(1) We find that of the beings who perform a particular action, all do
not get the same name but only a few, c. g. every one who cuts wood is not
called tuksawku, but the carpenter alone is so called; it is the ascetic only
who is called puari-vrdjak@ (i.e. a wanderer) and not every one who
wanders; it is only the sap of the sugar-cane that is called jvaona (i.e.
enlivening) and not everything that enlivens; it is only the planet Mars
that is called bhiumi-ju (i.e. earth-born), and not everything that is born
from the earth and so on. He seems to imply that there is a law of
specialization by which a particular name comes to be exclusively associated
with a particular object.

(2) He means to say that in spite of their manifold activities. objects
take their name from one particular action, which is the most important
and the most special to them, e.g. a carpenter performs many actions, yet
he is called tuksuku (i.e. a cutter of wood), because the shaping of things
by cutting wood is his most important function and can be specially
associated with him. - Durga has the following comment on it :

त्वमपि पश्यसि वयमपि पश्याम . . . तक्षन् कञ्चित्तक्षेत्युच्यते । अन्यस्तक्षन्नपि न
तक्षेत्युच्यते । आह कोऽत्र हेतुरिति । शृणु लोकसेव पृच्छ तमेवोपालभस्व न मयैष नियम:
कृत इति । अथ च तद्यथा समानमोहमानानां कञ्चिदेवार्थेन संयुज्यते वाञ्चिन्न . . . ।
स्वभावतो हि शब्दानां क्रियाजत्वेऽपि सति काञ्चिदेव क्रियामङ्गीकृत्यावस्थिति
तोति । अथवा क्रियातिशयकृतो नियम: स्यात् । यो हि यदतिशयेन करोति तस्या-
नेकक्रियावत्त्वेऽपि सति तद्चेतुक एव नामघेयप्रतिलम्भो भवतीत्ययं समाधि: । अथवा न
ब्रूमो यो यत्र यदा च तक्षति स एव तक्षेति । किं तर्हि यो यदा यत्र तक्षा भवति स एव
तक्षेति . . . पश्यामोऽनेकक्रियायुक्तानामप्येकक्रियाकारितो नामघेयप्रतिलम्भो भवति


70 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

. . तत्र यदुक्तमेकस्यानेकक्रियायोगादनेकनामता प्रसज्येतेति । एतदयुक्तम् । यदि
चोक्तमनेकेषामेकनामतेकस्य चानेकनामता प्राप्नोति ततश्च व्यवहाराप्रसिद्धिरिति । नहि
तदुभयमस्ति । अनेकॆषामेकक्रियायोगेऽपि हि सत्येकस्य चानेकक्रियायोगेऽपि हि सति
व्यवस्थित एव शब्द्नियम: स्वभावत एव लोके ।

: Thou seest, my friend, and we also see, that one man who cuts wood
is called 'carpenter', while another who does the same is not so called.
You may well ask the reason. Listen; go and ask the world, quarrel with
the world if you like, for it is not I who made this law. - But this is what
we find: of those who do the same work, some are named in accordance
with that activity, others not. You may say that because one object is
named in accordance with that activity, therefore others doing the same
thing should be similarly named . . . Although all nouns are derived
from verbs, the choice of names with reference to a particular action
is made by nature or it may be that the choice is
made by the law of special action. A man who performs one particular
action more specially, whatever other actions he may perform, will
obtain his name from that particular action. This is a settled rule. For
we do not call the man, who cuts wood now and then, by the name of
carpenter, but him we call carpenter who euts wood at any time, or in any
place and always. This is an instance of a name, the choice of which is
made by special action and this name may be freely given to others who
perform the same action specially. And if sometimes, or somewhere,
some other action is still more special to them, they will obtain their
names in accordance with that action only. . . .

We see that persons who perform many actions, obtain their names
from one particular action. A carpenter performs many other actions,
but he is not called after those activities. . . . If it be said, that many
persons who perform the same action, should have a common name, and
one person who performs many actions, should have as many names, all
that we can say is, that it is contrary to the practice of the world. Neither
is the ease. - Whether many persons perform a particular action, or a single
person many actions, the law about the names is that the choice is made
by natural selection. '

With this may be compared the remarks of Bréal.

'One conclusion is to be drawn from all that has gone before: it is an
undoubted fact that Language designates things in an incomplete and

' Cf. Max Miller's translation of some parts of the above-quoted passage (ibid., p. 167).


ETYMOLOGY, PHILOLOGY, AND SEMANTICS 71

inaccurate manner. - Incomplete: since we have not exhausted all that can
be said of the sun when we have declared it to be shining, or of the horse
when we say that it trots. AInucewrute: since we cannot say of the sun
that it shines when it has set, or of the horse that it trots when it is at
. rest, or when wounded or dead.

Substantives are signs attached to things: they contain exactly that
amount of truth which can be contained by a name, an amount which is of
necessity small in proportion to the reality of the object. . . . It will be
impossible for language to introduce into the word all the ideas which this
entity or object awakens in the mind. - Language is therefore compelled to
choose. !

(3) Many words whose grammatical form is quite regular are used to
denote names of objects, such as vratat? (creeper), jagaraka (wakeful),
durvi-homi (one who sacrifices with a ladle), &e.

(4) We find that many objects get names which are based on subsequent
actions, e. g. the wood-peecker,

(5) If prthiv?i (earth) is derived from तां] (to be broad) there is no
sophistry at all. It is not necessary to consider as to who made it broad
and on what basis, for it is broad to the eye.

Thus the question is discussed in the The same question is
discussed at length in the Uratylus also, wherein Plato propounds three
theories and makes the three characters in the dialogue their exponents.
Hermogenes holds that names are conventional, arbitrarily given, and
altered at will. Its antithesis is represented by Cratylus who maintains
that they are natural. Socrates takes an intermediate position and
admits that names are natural and at the same time have an element
of convention as well"

i. Early anti-Vedic Scepticism.

In the fifteenth section of the first chapter of the Nirukta, a critic
is introduced in the person of Kautsa, who not only questions the authority
of the Vedas, but actually maintains that the Vedie stanzas are meaningless,
adducing several arguments in support of his assertion. From the twentieth
section of the same chapter it is evident that Yaska believes the Vedic
hymns to be revealed, having been handed down from generation to
generation by oral tradition, and requiring to be studied with great care;
the purpose of his own work being to facilitate this study. As the

! Semantics, ch. xvili Eng. trans. by Cust, 2 Of. Jowett, Dialogues of Pato (Brd ed.), vol, i,
pp. 171, 172. pp. 397-8, 858, 366, 578.


72 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

Nirukta is one of the six auxiliary treatises of the Veda, it is rather
difficult to say with what object Yaska presented and tried to controvert
the view of his opponents, for it is inconceivable that the learned theologians
would reproduce, in their orthodox books, a controversy which challenges
the most fundamental beliefs of their religion. 'The reproduction of the
Kautsa controversy indicates on the one hand, that not only Yaska was
endowed with a rationalistic spirit, and was free from bigoted fanaticism,
but also that it was possible to carry on such discussions with tolerance at
that period of remote antiquity ; and implies on the other, that Kautsa was
an eminent scholar, or some great personality, or the exponent of some
philosophic system, whose thought could not be ignored. Some, however,
think that Yaska has invented Kautsa as a convenient method of giving
expression to Vedic Scepticism. This view is conjectural, and is not sup-
ported by any evidence. - Yaska uses the terms eke, and ekam, aparuam, &c.
when he wants to refer to something in general, and he could have very
well employed the same terms with regard to the above-mentioned con-
troversy, had it not been associated with a particular individual, i.e.
Kautsa. There is no ground to doubt the historical existence of the
authorities whose opinions are quoted, or referred to, or to whom particular
statements are attributed, by Yaska. And unless the contrary can be
proved, it may be assumed that Kautsa was an historical entity. It
may also be taken for granted that he was the leader of a movement,
which may be described as something akin to materialistic rationalism,
and which was the result of a remarkable literary activity, a characteristic
of the epoch of Yaska, as pointed out elsewhere. But Kautsa was by no
means the originator of such a movement, the beginning of which can be
traced to an earlier period. Its origin is probably to be sought in
sectarianism. For a considerable time, the Atharva-veda was not recognized
as divine revelation. For the followers of the Atharvua-veda, it was there-
fore necessary to demonstrate the superiority of their own Veda to the
RV., the SV., and the VS. Perhaps the most effective means, employed for
the achievement of this object, was to invent legends and allegorical
stories, in which all the four Vedas are introduced, and in which a certain
task is proposed for them. The RV., the SV., and the VS. are invariably
shown to be incompetent in its performance, and it is given up as too
difficult by the three Vedas in succession, being finally accomplished by
the AV., whose superiority over the other three Vedas is thus implicitly
expressed. I quote the following two stories from the Gopatha Brahmana
in support of my statement:

तान्वागभ्युवाच । अश्व: | | agige एत्योवाचाहमश्वं शमेयमिति ।


EARLY ANTI-YEDIC SCEPTICISM 73

तस्मा अविसृप्ताय महद्भयं ससृजे । स एतां प्राचो दिशं भेजे । स होवाचाशान्तो
न्वयमश्च इति । तं यजुर्वेद एत्योवाचाहमश्चं शमेयमिति । तस्मा अविसृप्नाय महद्भयं
ससृजे । सा एतां प्रतोचीं दिशं भेजे । स होवाचाशान्तो न्वयमश्च इति । तं सामवेद
एत्योवाचाहमश्चं शमेयमिति । केन नु त्वं शमिष्यसोति । रथन्तरं नाम मे सामाघोरं
चाक्रूरं च तेनाश्चममिष्टूयते । तस्मा अथ विसृप्ताय तदेव महद्भयं ससृजे । स
दिशं भेजे । स होवाचाशान्तो न्वयमञ्च इति ।

'Speech said to them, "tame the horse". "Be it so", replied they.
Having approached him, the RV. said, "I shall tame the horse". When
he set about (accomplishing it), a great terror seized him. He turned her
in the eastern direction. He declared, "this horse is wild indeed ". The
VS. approached him and said, "I shall tame the horse". When he set
about (accomplishing it), a great terror seized him. He turned her in the
western direction. He declared, "this horse is wild indeed". The SV.
approached him and said, "I shall tame the horse". " How indeed wilt
thou tame the horse?" " Rathantaram is the name of my song of praise
which is neither terrific, nor harsh. With that the horse is praised ". But
when he set about (accomplishing it), the same great terror seized him.
He turned her in the northern direction. - He declared, " the horse is indeed
still wild ".

After these futile attempts, they are advised to seek Atharvana the
tamer. They approach him and request him to tame the horse. He
prepares the water of tranquillity, which he sprinkles over the horse.
From every limb of the horse flames fall down on the ground, and the
horse, perfectly tame, salutes the sage.

The object of the following story is to show the incompetency of
the three Vedas to afford protection :

ते देवा इन्द्रमब्रुवन् । इमन्नस्तावद्यज्ञं गोपाय . . . . स वै नस्तेन रूपेण गोपाय येन
नो रूपेण भूयिष्ठं छादयसि येन गोप्तुमिति । स ॠस्वेदो भूत्वा पुरस्तात्परीत्यो-
पातिष्ठत् । तं देवा अब्रुवन्। अन्यत्तद्रूपं कुरुष्व नेतेन नो रूपेण भूयिष्ठं छादयसि नेतेन
गोप्तुमिति । स यजुवेंदो भूत्वा पश्चात्परीत्योपातिष्ठत् । तं देवा अब्रुवन् ।
अन्यत्तद्रूपं कुरुष्व । नेतेन नो रूपेण भूयिष्ठं छादयसि नेतेन शकच्यसि गोप्नुमिति । स
सामवेदो भूत्वा उत्तरत: परोत्योपातिष्ठत् । तं देवा अब्रुवन् । अन्यत्तद्रूपं कुरुष्व । नेतेन
नो रूपेण भूचिष्ठं छादयसि नैतेन शच्यसि गोप्तुमिति ।

'The gods said to Indra, " Do now protect this sacrifice of ours. Verily
protect us with that form of thine, with which thou afftordest us the
greatest shelter, with which thou canst best protect us'. He assumed the

1 GB. i. 2. 18; Bib. Ind. ed., p. 35.


74 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

form of the RV., and having approached, stood before them. The gods
said to him, "assume some other form; with this form thou canst not
afford us the greatest shelter, with this form thou canst not best pro-
tect us". He assumed the form of the VS., and having approached
stood behind them. The gods said to him, "assume some other form ;
with this form thou canst not afford us the greatest shelter, with this
form thou canst not best protect us". - He assumed the form of the SV.,
and. having approached stood to their north. The gods said to him,
"assume some other form; with this form thon canst not afford us the
greatest shelter, with this form thou canst not best protect us ".''

Indra then assumes the form of the Brahma-veda, i.e. the Atharvu-veda,
which is approved by the gods as competent to give them the greatest
protection.

It need hardly be said that the efforts of the followers of the Atharva-
veda were crowned with success, for, in course of time, the AV. was
recognized as one of the revealed scriptures. But their method of dis-
crediting the other Vedas gave rise to a movement of inquiry and
scepticism-a movement, the traces of which can still be discovered in
isolated passages of the Aranyakas and the Upanisads. Besides the fact
that the anti-Vedic ideas have been preserved in the Aronyukas and the
Upanigads, which, according to the orthodox tradition, are a part of the
seriptures, indicates that the movement must have been important and
wide-spread, so much so that even some of the Vedic Scholars came under
its influence, and freely gave expression to their heterodox views, some
of which have survived. I quote the following passages in support of the
foregoing conclusion :

tas a a afegia sususuq: कावषेया: किमथा वयमध्येष्यामहे किमथा वयं
I वाचि हि प्राणं प्राणे वा वाचं ut aps प्रभव: स्र एवाप्यय: ।

© Verily it was so, then the Kavaseyas, the learned seers, said, " to what
purpose shall we study the Vedas, to what purpose shall we sacrifice ?

We sacrifice breath in speech, and speech in breath; whosoever is born is
indeed the authoritative person.""?

उक्थमुक्यमिति वै प्रजा वदन्ति तदिदमेवोक्यमियमेव पृथिवीतो हीदं सर्वमुत्तिष्ठति
यदिदं किञ्च ।

'People say, " Hymn, Hymn". This earth indeed, is the hymn, for all,
whatever exists springs from it.'?

The study of the Vedas is regarded as avidyg@ (non-knowledge) in MU.

! GB. i. 2. 19; Bib. Ind. ed., p. 36. 2 A,. A. iii. 2. 6; Keith's ed., p. 139.
3 A. A. ii. 1.2; Keith's ed., p. 101.


EARLY ANTI-YVEDIC SCEPTICISM 75

I. 1.4-5; as lower knowledge in MU. III. 2.3; KU. I. 2. 23. 'The full
force of this condemnation will be realized, if it is borne in mind that the
Upanisads are also regarded as revealed books (iruti). The case would
be analogous if, for instance, St. Paul had declared in one of his epistles
that the study of the Bible is non-knowledge, or lower knowledge. 'The
following are the other anti-Vedic passages: Brk. U., I. 5. 23; Kou. U.,
II 5; CA. U., V. 11-24; TU., II. 5; Vivekucudamanit 2; the Jain Uttara-
dhyayama« siutras, IV. 12; XIV.12; Gita, 11, 42,45; IX. 21: XI. 48, 53.
In order to reconcile them with the pro-Vedic doctrines, the commentators
have offered ingenious explanations of these passages.

It is possible that the Buddha came under the influence of this anti-
Vedie movement at an early period, which may be responsible for his
vehement denunciation not only of Vedie rites and practices, injunctions,
and invocations, &e., but of Vedie lore. He held them up to ridicule, and
discarded them as an obstacle to final emancipation. His views about
Vedic knowledge have been preserved in the form of a dialogue in the
Tevijja sutto in the Dighe Nik&ga. Two Brahmanas, Vasettha and
Bharadvaja quarrel as to which is the true path. Unable to settle their
dispute, they go to the Buddha for a decision. 'The Buddha holds a
conversation with them, and after perplexing and confounding them with
analogies and arguments in a Socratic manner, gradually leads them to his
own way of thinking, and finally converts them to Buddhism. The im-
portant parts of the dialogue with regard to the Vedas are the following :

13. 'Well then, Vasettha, those ancient fsis of the Brahmanas versed
in the three Vedas, the authors of the verses ... to wit, . . . Vamadeva,
Vessamitta, Jamadaggi, Angirasa, Bharadvaja, Väsettha, Kassapa, and
Bhagu-did even they speak thus, saying: " We know it, we have seen it,
where Brahma is, whence Brahma is, whither Brahma is?"

" Not so, Gautama!"

15. . .. «Just, Vasettha, as when a string of blind men are elinging to
one another, neither can the foremost see, nor ean the middle one see,
nor can the hindmost see-just even so, methinks, Vasettha, is the talk
of the Brähmanäs versed in the three Vedas but blind talk . . . the
talk . .. of the Brähmanäs versed in the three Vedas turns out to be
ridiculous, mere words, a vain and empty thing."

24. " Again, Vasettha, if this river Aciravati were full of water even to
the brim, and overflowing, and a man with business on the other side,
bound for the other side, should come up, and want to eross over, and he,
standing on this bank, should invoke the farther bank, and say, 'Come
hither, O Farther Bank! Come over to this side !'"

«Now what think you, Vasettha? Would the farther bank of the


76 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

river Aciravati, by reason of that man's invoking and praying and hoping
and praising, come over to this side?"

«Certainly not, Gautama!"

25. "In just the same way, Väsettha, do the Brähman&s versed in the
three Vedas ... say thus: 'Indra we call upon, Soma we call upon,
Varuna we call upon, Isina we call upon, Pajapati we call upon, Brahma
we call upon ,. .. Verily, Vascttha, . . that they, by reason of their invoking
and praying and hoping and praising, should after death . . . become
united with Brahma-verily such a condition of things can in no wise be."

35. ". .. Therefore is it that the threefold wisdom of the Brahmanas,
wise in their three Vedas, is called a waterless desert, their threefold
wisdom is called a pathless jungle, their threefold wisdom is called
perdition. "'?

In criticism of this, it may be remarked that the views of the Buddha
concerning Vedic prayer are erroneous. His arguments, and especially
his analogy of the bank of the Aciravati, are applicable to any other
prayer as well, and thus prayer itself will become an absurdity. Not only
is prayer a very important act of worship in every religion, but in the
form of the wheel of prayer is the most distinguishing characteristic of
Tibetan Buddhism. - Morcover, prayer is a psychical phenomenon, it exerts
a powerful influence on the mind through the medium of subconscious
suggestion, and as such its efficacy is beyond doubt. Further, the analogy
of the Buddha is fallacious. To compare not only sentient but omniscient
and omnipotent God with an inanimate piece of matter like the bank of
a river, and then to deduce a conclusion from this comparison that because
the latter does not respond to prayer hence the former also does not do so,
is altogether unjustifiable. Nevertheless the Buddha's denunciation of the
Vedas developed a strong contempt for them in his followers who often
trampled them under foot." - It is also probable that these teachings of the
Buddha inspired other non-Vedie schools as well. The criticisms of some
of these schools are equally vehement, and one seems to hear the rever-
berated echo of the voice of the Buddha even in some of their expressions.
The following passage gives the views of the Carvaka system :

इति चेत् तदपि न प्रमाणकोटिं प्रवेष्टुमीष्टे । अनृतव्याघातपुनरुक्तदोषैर्दूषिततया
वेदिकमन्येरेव घूर्तवके: परस्परं कर्मकाण्डप्रामाण्यवादिमि ज्ञानकाएडस्य ज्ञानकाण्डप्रा-
माण्यवादिमि: कर्मकाण्डस्य च प्रतिक्षिप्तत्वेन त्रय्या घूर्तप्रलापमाचत्वेनाग्निहोत्रादेर्जीवि-
कामात्रप्रयोजनत्वात् । तथा चाह भाणक: ।

! The Diclogues of the Buddha, translated into English by Rhys-Davids, S.B.PD., vol. ii,
pp. 304-14: ef. also S.B.E., vol. xi, pp. 159-208.
2 See the episode of Kumarila Bhatta's life in a Buddhist monastery,


EARLY SCEPTICISM 77

अग्निहोत्रं त्रयोवेदास्तरिदणएड भस्मगुण्ठनम् ।
बुद्धिपौरुषहोनानां जीविकेति बृहस्पति: ॥
पशुञ्चेन्निहित: स्वर्गे ज्योतिष्टोमे गमिष्यति ।
स्वपिता यजमानेन तत्र कस्मान्न हिंस्यते ॥

चयो वेदस्य कर्तारो भणएडधूर्तनिशाचरा: ।
पण्डितानां वच: स्मृतम् ॥

'If you object ..." how should men of experienced wisdom engage in
the Agnihotra and other sacrifices", ... your objection cannot be accepted

as any proof to the contrary, since the Agnihotra, &e. are only useful as
means of livelihood, for the Veda is tainted by the three faults of untruth,
sel{-contradietion, and tautology ; then again the impostors who call them-
selves Vedic Pandits are mutually destructive, as the authority of the
Jüänakända is overthrown by those who maintain that of the Karma-
kanda, and vice versa; and lastly, the three Vedas themselves are only
the incoherent rhapsodies of knaves, and to this effect runs the popular
saying: Brihaspati says that the (performance of) Agnihotra, the three
Vedas, the three staves, and smearing oneself with ashes, are but means
of livelihood for those who have neither sense, nor manliness."

'If a beast, slain in the jyotistoma« sacrifice goes to heaven, why then,
does not the sacrificer kill his own father ?' *

'The three authors of the Veda were bufftoons, knaves, and spirits of
darkness. Jarphari, turphuri, &e., these aro the well-known rhapsodies
of the Pandits.* 3

The Arkata system has the following criticism with regard to the
Vedas :

अनादेरागमस्यार्थो न च सर्वज्ञ आदिमान् ।
vf«am त्वसत्येन स कथं प्रतिपाद्यते ॥

(And a non-eternal omniscient being cannot be the subject of an eternal
Veda; then how can he be expounded by a spurious and a false Veda ?' *

Cf. also : 'There was neither the Sama-veda, nor the Najur-veda, nor
the Rg-veda, nor was any work done by man.' 5

The earlier anti-Vedlie scepticism, together with the doctrines of the
Buddhist, the Carvaka, and the Arhata systems must have ereated, in

1 Sarva-dar$ana-samgrahah, Bib. Iud. ed., p. 2. 3 Loc. cit.
For this passage I have adopted Cowell's * Op. cit., p. 28.
translation with some modifications. 5 Mahabharata Vanaparran, 11234.

* Op. cit., p. 6.


78 INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRUKTA

course of time, a considerable amount of opposition to the teachings of the
Vedas. It was therefore necessary for the followers of the Vedas to
answer the objections of their opponents and to re-establish their position.
Hence Jaimini was compelled to devote almost the whole of the first
adhyaya of the Purva-Mimarms® to the examination and refutation of
such objections. The substance of Kautsa's criticism, together with the
subject-matter of Yaska's rejoinder is amplified with numerous additions
in the first chapter of the PM. The controversy, however, is too long to
be quoted here. Kumarila Bhatta, the commentator on the PM. was
another expounder of Vedic doctrines, and after him the task devolved
on the great Saükaräcärya, who by his eloquence, vast learning, profound
philosophy, and great powers of debate rebuilt the shattered supremaey of
the Vedic religion, and extirpated Buddhism ! and other non-Vedic systems
from the land of their birth. But adverse critics of the Veda, even after
the great éaflkarécarya, have not been altogether unknown in India. For
instance, Nanaka, the founder of the Sikh religion, may be mentioned
as a notable teacher who laid great emphasis on saintliness, and discarded
the Vedas as mere mythical records. He said :
Santa ki mahimd vela na jane
Caron veda kahimni.

'The greatness of a saint is not known to the Veda ; all the four Vedas
are merely (books of) stories."

Hence we find that Sayanicarya again reverts to the same discussion
in the introduction of his commentary on the HRg-veda. The number of
arguments for and against is still further increased. A brief summary
of the controversy is subjoined :

Criticism,

The prime facie view is that there is no such thing as the Veda; how
can there be a part of it, as the Rg-veda? .... It is not possible to admit
the existence of the Veda, for it is not capable of definition or proof.*

(i) If the Veda is defined as being the last of three kinds of proofs,
perception, inference, and evidence, the definition will be too wide, for
it will include the Simrtis as well.

(2) If the Veda is defined as an instrument of apprehending trans-
cendental things, the definition will again suffer from the same defect.

' However, the final blow was dealt by _ the commentary of Siyanaeirya,vol.i,pp.2-3.
the Mohammedan invaders, who destroyed _ The Sanskrit text of the introductory part
the Buddhist monasteries in the Northern _ of Siyana's commentary, together with an

part of India. English translation, is given by Peterson in
? Sec Max Müler!s edition? of the RV. with _ his Handbook to the Stuiy of the Rgveda, Part I.


EARLY ANTI-VEDIC SCEPTICISM 79

(3) The qualifying expression, 'being not the product of human
authors', will not improve the definition, for the Vedas are the works of
human authors, though they may be super-men.

(4) If you say that by 'human authors' you mean 'men having a
corporeal frame", we will draw your attention to the puriso-silkta.

(5) If you say that by 'corporeal frame' you mean 'a body which is
the result of the actions of a previous life', we will point out that Agni,
Vayu, and Aditya, the authors of the Vedas, were endowed with bodies
which were the result of actions of a previous life.

(6) If the Veda is defined as a collection of words con-
sisting of the muntru and the Brakmana, it does not hold good, for up till
now it has not been settled what is mantra, and what is Brahmana.

(7) Nor is there any proof of the existence of the Veda. The scriptural
quotations in support of your contention are useless, as they are cited from
the Vedas themselves, and nothing can be proved by its own evidence.
No man, however clever, can mount his own shoulders.

(8) If you say that the consensus of public opinion is in favour of the
Vedas, we will reply that the whole world can be deluded : for instance,
the people believe in a blue sky, yet there is no such thing as sky, nor has
its blue colour any reality.

Nayama's rejoinder.

(1) The definition of the Veda as a collection of words, consisting of the
muntra and the Brahmana is faultless; therefore Apastamba has said,
'The Veda is the name given to the mantra and the Brahmana.

(2) It is true that things like a jar, or a piece of cloth, &e., are not
self-luminous, but it does not follow from this that the sun, and the stars.
te., too have no such character. - Granting that it is impossible for a man
to mount his own shoulders, nevertheless, the Vedas have the power to
illuminate themselves as well as other things.

(3) You have to recognize the various kinds of proofs, including
evidence. And the evidence of the Smrtis, and of tradition cannot but be
admitted as proof of the existence of the Veda. Hence, the Vedas cannot
be overthrown by any of the infidels like the followers of Carvaka.

Further criticism.
(1) Admitting that there exists a thing called the Veda, it is not worth
a commentary, for the Veda is of no authority (na Ai Veduk pramanam).
(2) Some define authority as 'an instrument of sound experience',
others as 'a means of acquiring knowledge, not known before'. Neither
of these is to be found in the Veda.


       
 
 

INTRODUCTION TO THE NIRU

  

Then follows an amplified statement of Kautsa's criticism. Say
reply gives the substance of Yaska's rejoinder with additions and mod
tions, to which is added a long quotation from the first chapter of
reference to which has already been made.

It would be superfluous to collect the pro-Vedic passages. 'The Ved:
are the foundation of the whole of Sanskrit literature. But the triumph o
the Vedic school is apparent from this fact alone that all the anti-Vedic
systems have either perished, or been driven into exile, or been reduced to
insignificance. - Thus the pre-Buddhistic anti-Vedic scepticism can now be.
traced in a few isolated passages only. Buddhism, once the state religion
of the Mauryan Empire at its zenith under Asoka,-the then greatest
Empire in the world -has been banished from its native land. The
Carvaka and the Arhata systems have been reduced to insignificance.
Their followers are few and far between, and their influence on India
thought and religion is so small that for all practical purposes it can be

wally |__ ।
safely ignored.

 
  
    
 
 
 
 

  

   
   
  
 
 
 
 
 
  
  


 


a

UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA AT LOS ANGELES
THE UNIVERSITY LIBRARY

This book is DUE on the last date stamped below

a ष्टाछ्रुङ्कं'श्लिच्छैहु’ ®

 

Form L-9-15»3,'84

 

UNIVERSITY OF CAL FCORNIA
AT
LOS ^' GELES
LL-oRARY


 

UC SOUTHERN REGI

MID I

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

ONAL

»mritiiii

 

 

 

 

001 370 693 2

University of California
SOUTHERN REGIONAL LIBRARY FACILITY
305 De Neve Drive - Parking Lot 17 « Box 951388
LOS ANGELES, CALIFORNIA 90095-1388

[- Return this materia! to the library from which it was borrowed.

4UN 3: 0 200

X


 


